 And we're seeing that in humans.
 The research is still in its early stages,
 Like other specialists, he is sceptical about whether diabetes can be cured, and he points out that these findings are not relevant to people who already have type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Sara Danius, the permanent Secretary of the Swedish Academy,
 Danius declared,
 With prior, Ring's executive director, Jamie Siminoff, mentioned that the company had begun to rage after the Bell of its entry could not be heard from the shop that he had set up in his garage.
 He said he built a Wifi.
 Siminoff declared that sales skyrocketed after his appearance on an episode of Shark Tank in 2013, in which the television show's panel of investors refused to fund the company.
 Towards the end of the year 2017, Siminoff made an appearance on the television shopping channel, QVC.
 Ring also reached a settlement in the litigation with the company's chief competitor, ADT Corporation.
 To date, no drug has been proven to treat the existing infection caused by Ebola, even though there is an experimental vaccine that seems to be able to decrease the mortality caused by this disease.
 Zmapp, a combination of antibodies, had a promising early field result, but formal studies showed it was less beneficial than expected to prevent death.
 In the PALM study,
 USA Gymnastics supports the United States Olympic Committee's statement and recognizes the urgent need for the Olympic family to foster a safe environment for all of our athletes.
 We agree with the USOC's statement that the interests of athletes, clubs and their sports can be better served by advancing meaningful change within our organization,
 USA Gymnastics supports an independent investigation that can shed light on how the abuse of the proportion that Larry Nassa's survivors described with such courage could have gone on for so long and accepts any necessary and appropriate changes.
 The goal of USA Gymnastics and USOC is the same: to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible so that athletes can pursue their dreams in a protected, positive and empowered environment.
 During the 1960s, Brzezinski worked for John F. Kennedy as an advisor,
 Asesoró a Carter in matters of foreign policy in the elections of 1976.
 As a national security advisor,
 The film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated in all the most important categories.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best actor and best actress, respectively.
 Among the other nominations are best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best editing, best original score, best production design, best sound editing, best sound mixing, and best original screenplay.
 There were two nominations for best original song: Audition and City of stars.
 On Sunday night, in a press release,
 The announcement came after a phone call between Trump and the President of Turkey, Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 Turkey would also assume the custody of the ISIS fighters who were captured, and to whom European nations, as the statement indicates, denied repatriation.
 In addition to confirming that at least some dinosaurs were feathered, a theory that's already been widely accepted,
 According to specialists, this animal has a plumage of a reddish-brown color on the upper part and a paler or carotenoid tint on the lower part.
 As well, the finding allows us to better understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 Given that the plumage of dinosaurs does not have a well-developed axis, called the rachis, but does have other features of feathers, such as barbs and barbules, researchers have come to the conclusion that the rachis is likely the result of a later evolutionary development of these other characteristics.
 The structure of the feathers suggests that their function was not related to flight, but rather to regulate or indicate the temperature. The researchers maintain that, although it is the tail of a young dinosaur, the sample analyzed presents features of an adult's plumage, not of a chick.
 Even though it's the tail of a short-lived dinosaur,
 In the morning of yesterday, in Gaziantep, Turkey, a car bomb killed two police officers and injured more than twenty other people.
 From the government, they reported that fifteen of the injured were police officers.
 The suspect,
 It was discovered that the sun regulated itself by the same basic principles as other stars: the only factors that drove its activity within the system were its luminosity and its rotation.
 The intensity of the light and rotation combine to calculate the Rossby number of a Star, which is linked to the plasma flow.
 A smaller number of Rossby, the less is the activity of the star in relation to its magnetic inversions.
 Iwasaki faced numerous problems during his trip.
 He was robbed by pirates, bitten by a rabid dog in Tibet, escaped from a Nepalese marriage, and was stopped by the police in India.
 The 802.11n standard works in both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 This will make it compatible with earlier versions of 802.11a, 802.11b, and 802.11g,
 The speeds of the 802.11n standard are much higher than those achieved by its predecessors, with a theoretical maximum throughput of 600 Mbps.
 Duvall, who is married and has two grown children,
 During the hearing, Miller said,
 «We will work hard to reduce the level of carbon dioxide emitted per unit of GDP by 2020, so that the difference is significant compared to 2005,» Hu said.
 No mention was made of a figure for the cuts, and he said they would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu incentivó a los estados en vías de desarrollo a «no volver al tradicional camino de contaminar primero y hacer limpieza después».
 But,
 The Irak study group elevated its report today at twelve zero GMT.
 Advise that no one can give guarantees that any Iraqi action at this point will stop sectarian fighting, the increasing violence, or a slide towards chaos.
 The report begins with a call for an open debate and a consensus in the United States about Middle East policies.
 The report is highly critical of virtually every aspect of the current policy of the executive branch in Iraq, and calls for an immediate change of direction.
 Contains 78 recommendations,
 Cristina Fernández de Kirchner, who at the time holds the office of senator and is the first lady of the Argentine Republic, announced last night in La Plata, a city located 50 kilometers from Buenos Aires, that she will run for the Presidency.
 The Argentine theater was the place where Mrs . Kirchner announced her intention to run as President, this is the same place where she started her campaign for the Senate in the year 2005, representing the province of Buenos Aires.
 The question that gave rise to the debate was the controversy surrounding the amount of money allocated to the relief and reconstruction following Hurricane Katrina, which some fiscal conservatives dubbed the Bush-New Orleans Agreement.
 The criticisms of the liberals,
 More than four million people gathered in Rome to witness the funeral.
 There was so much people,
 There were large television screens set up in different parts of Rome, so that everyone could watch the ceremony.
 In many other Italian cities,
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policies of concentrating its resources on easy cases, especially car thefts, in order to improve its success rate.
 In the fiscal year 2005, Congress began funding the campaign against obscenity and gave the FBI the instruction to assign 10 agents to deal with pornography for adults.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest score in entries: 70 notations with only 41 balls, connecting 11 fours and 2 sixes.
 The performance of both Sachin Tendulkar and Rahul Dravid, middle order batsmen, was good and they scored a century stand.
 But after losing the captain's wicket, India could only manage 36 runs and 7 of their wickets were bowled out.
 The first U S . President, George W . Bush, arrived in Singapore early on November 16, kicking off a seven-day tour of Asia.
 The vice Prime Minister of Singapore, Wong Kan Seng,
 After a week of midterm election defeats, Bush gave a speech to the audience about the expansion of trade in the Asian continent.
 Stephen Harper, Prime Minister, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a committee where all parties are represented before the second reading, and after the 25-minute meeting at the PMO on Tuesday with Jack Layton, the NDP leader.
 During the meeting with the Prime Minister, Layton had requested that changes be made to the Conservatives' environmental law, calling for a, quote, exhaustive and complete redrafting of its wording.
 Since the Federal Government intervened and took over the financing of the Mersey hospital in Davenport, Tasmania, state authorities and some members of the Federal Parliament have called the move a deception, with an eye to the Federal elections, which will be held in November.
 However, Prime Minister John Howard stated that the only purpose of the law was to protect the hospital's facilities from degradation by the Tasmanian government, by giving it an additional 45 million Australian dollars.
 According to the latest report, sea level readings indicate the formation of a tsunami, and there has been some activity of this phenomenon in the vicinity of Pago Pago and Niue.
 No major damage or injuries have been reported in Tonga, but power was temporarily disrupted, which is thought to have frustrated the Tongan authorities' receipt of the tsunami warning issued by the PTWC.
 Fourteen schools in the area of Hawaii or in the nearby area closed completely on Wednesday,
 The President of the United States,
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for Bush, referred to the North Korean commitment as an important step towards the goal of achieving the verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, the tenth storm of the Atlantic hurricane season,
 For now, the National Hurricane Center says,
 According to estimates made by the Corps of Engineers,
 Due to the overflow of the levee that is near the Ninth Ward, the water is now reaching the waistline at that location, which had already suffered flooding of up to 20 feet during Hurricane Katrina.
 The water flows over a dam in a stretch that has a width of 100 feet.
 Adam Cuerden, administrator of Commons, expressed his frustration over the deletions in a statement he made to Wikinwes last month.
 «In essence, he lied to us from the beginning, pretending that he was doing it for legal reasons, and then pretending to listen to us until the moment he deleted the artistic content».
 The enojo of the community led to the current efforts to draft a policy on the site's sexual content, which hosts millions of openly licensed media.
 Although it was eminently a theoretical work, the program was drafted with the purpose of simulating the observations made on the Sagittarius Galaxy.
 Would the tidal forces between the dark matter in the Galaxy and the Milky way be enough to cause the effect that the group of scientists are expecting?
 The Milky way influences the Sagittarius Galaxy in the same way that the moon exerts a force of attraction on our planet and causes the tides.
 The experts came to the conclusion that the dark matter affects each other just like regular matter.
 This theory holds that most of the dark matter that surrounds a galaxy sits in a halo around it, consisting of many small particles.
 In television coverage, you can see white smoke emanating from the plant.
 The local government warns those who reside near the plant that they should not leave their homes, keep the air conditioners off, and not consume water from the tap.
 According to the nuclear agency of Japan,
 According to speculations of the authorities,
 Extremely resistant tuberculosis,
 During an interview, he pointed out that the new variant generated a lot of concern and alarm, given its high mortality rate.
 The doctor Moll thinks that some patients could have contracted the virus inside the hospital and that at least two of the infected were health care workers at that hospital.
 In a year, an infected person can infect between 10 and 15 people with whom he or she has had close contact.
 The percentage of XDR-TB in the total TB group still seems to be low,
 The satellites, which weighed over 1,000 pounds and traveled at nearly 17,500 miles per hour, collided 491 miles above the earth.
 According to experts, the explosion that triggered the collision was massive.
 They're still trying to figure out how important it was,
 The U S . strategic command, which depends on the Department of defense,
 The results of the tracking analysis will be made available on a publicly accessible Website.
 The authorities of Ohio informed that a doctor who worked in the hospital for children of Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, will be accused of aggravated homicide after the corpse of his mother was found in the trunk of his car on Wednesday.
 The doctor, Malar Balasubramanian,
 The Oldsmobile Intrigue,
 There they found the corpse of Saroja Balasubramanian,
 The police stated that the corpse had been there about a day.
 The first cases of the disease during this season were recorded towards the end of July.
 Pigs are the carriers of the disease, which then migrates to humans via mosquitoes.
 The outbreak has led the Indian authorities to take measures such as the deployment of pig hunters, the distribution of thousands of mosquito nets to the population and the use of pesticides in the most affected areas.
 The authorities have also guaranteed several million vials of the vaccine to fight encephalitis, which will allow sanitary companies to prepare for the next year.
 This year, the scarcity of monetary resources and the low priority, compared to other diseases, have caused delays in the execution of the vaccine delivery plans in the historically most vulnerable regions.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where, after three years, he got a job at the Swedish postal office and there became chief engraver.
 The amount of stamps he made,
 The quality and the level of detail of his work are so well-known that he has become one of the few «household names» among philatelists.
 Included in the Guinness book of world records, his one thousandth stamp was the formidable «Memorable feats of the Swedish Kings» (David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl, year 2000).
 In addition, he has had a part in the engraving of bank notes for many States,
 After the accident, they rushed Gibson to a hospital, but he died shortly after.
 The truck driver, a 64-year-old man,
 They removed the vehicle from the scene of the accident at around 12:00 GMT the same day.
 A witness said,
 Everybody ran back from the scene of the accident.
 Other topics on the Bali agenda include saving the world's forests and sharing technologies to help developing nations grow in a less polluting way.
 The UN intends to complete a fund of assistance in favor of the countries victimized by the effects of global warming, in order to be able to confront its impact.
 Money could be spent on flood-proofing homes,
 Some efforts to silence women who speak out about their health,
 She concluded this based on the large number of positive and encouraging comments from women and men urging that contraceptives be considered a health care necessity.
 Once the clashes had ended,
 Although the negotiators attempted to compose the situation, the demands of the prisoners are confusing.
 The inmates started a fire in the prison yard between 10:00 and 11:00 p.m. MDT.
 Quickly, agents armed with anti-riot gear,
 The rescue teams managed to extinguish the fire at 11:35 p.m.
 With the construction of the dam in 1963, the seasonal flooding that left sediments along the river was stopped.
 This sediment was necessary for the formation of sand banks and beaches, which, in turn, functioned as habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species of fish have been extinguished, and two others are in danger of extinction, including the Gila cypha.
 Well, the water level will only rise a few feet past the flooding,
 No tsunami alert was issued,
 Even though there was no tsunami threat,
 Well, Winfrey wept at her farewell,
 «This will not be a farewell, it is only the end of one chapter and the beginning of another».
 The comfortable reelection of the incumbent, Hifikepunye Pohamba, was confirmed by the final results of Namibia's parliamentary and presidential elections.
 The ruling party, the South West Africa People's Organization,
 The coalition troops and the Afghans have moved into the region to secure the place, and other coalition aircraft have been sent to assist them.
 The accident took place on the top of a mountainous region, and it is believed to have been caused by an enemy's fire.
 The efforts to find the place of the accident must contend with bad weather and rugged terrain.
 The World Health Organisation,
 The spokesman for Medecines Sans Frontiere, Richard Veerman, commented,
 The beginning of the games was at 10:00 a.m., accompanied by good weather, and, except for a slight rain at noon that soon dispersed, it was an ideal day for Rugby 7.
 South Africa, the tournament's top seed, began well by winning a comfortable 26-0 victory against Zambia, who are in fifth place.
 Although they showed themselves to be dormant against their Southern sisters,
 His disciplined defense, his ball handling skills and his excellent teamwork led him to stand out and it became clear that this was the team to defeat.
 The authorities in Amsterdam and the Anne Frank House maintain that a fungus has infected the tree and that it is dangerous to public health because it is in imminent danger of falling.
 His trial was scheduled for Tuesday, but was saved after an emergency court ruling.
 The diameter of all the entrances to the cave, known as the Seven Sisters, is at least 100 to 250 meters.
 As the infrared images,
 During the day, its temperature is lower than that of the surface that surrounds it,
 Well, if it's not as regular as the big caves on our planet,
 In France, elections have traditionally been a low-tech affair.
 After the officials verify the identity of the voter,
 The French electoral law establishes the procedures in a fairly strict manner.
 Since 1988, the urns have to be transparent, which allows the electors and observers to verify that there are no surplus at the beginning of the vote and that no others are added than those of the voters, duly counted and authorized.
 Candidates have the right to send representatives to monitor each stage of the process, and during the night, volunteers count the votes under strict supervision and according to specific procedures.
 Asus Eee PC, which was previously launched globally for its cost-saving and functionality, became the subject of heated debates at the Taipei International Information Technology Show 2007.
 But the market for laptop consumers versified drastically and changed after ASUS received the Taiwan Sustainable Development Award from the Executive Yuan of the Republic of China in 2007.
 The Website describes the show as,
 In its early days, the program was only broadcast on the Internet radio station, TogiNet radio, a long-running space focused on the spoken word format.
 By the end of 2015, TogiNet installed the AstroNet Radio station as a branch.
 Originally, the show featured local, amateur voice actors.
 The looting spread throughout the night,
 A witness described Bishkek as sinking into a state of anarchy,
 Various inhabitants of Bishkek blamed the protesters from the South for the outbreak.
 South Africa defeated New Zealand,
 The final score indicated a one point victory, 21 to 20, ending a 15 game winning streak for the All Blacks.
 In the case of the Springboks, it meant overcoming a run of five consecutive losses.
 It was the last game for the All Blacks, who had already won the trophy two weeks earlier.
 The final game of the series will be played at Ellis Park, Johannesburg, next week, in a match between the Springboks and Australia.
 A moderate earthquake shook the West of Montana at 10:08 p.m. on Monday.
 Nor in the United States Geological Survey,
 The epicenter of the quake was located nearly 20 kilometers northeast of Dillon and almost 65 kilometers south of Butte.
 Confirmed that the deadly avian flu strain, H5N1, attacked a wild duck that died, found Monday in a pond near Lyon, in eastern France.
 France ranks seventh among the European Union members hit by the virus, behind Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy.
 The cases in Croatia and Denmark have not been confirmed.
 The claim of Chambers against God rested on the death,
 But the court said,
 The story that Camille Saint-Saens tells in his opera, Samson and Delilah,
 As a result, the artists smoke cannabis cigarettes on stage, and the show encourages the audience to do the same.
 The former Speaker of the House, Newt Gingrich, the governor of Texas, Rick Perry, and Michele Bachmann, a member of the House, took fourth, fifth, and sixth place, respectively.
 After the results came in, Gingrich praised Santorum, but launched harsh words against Romney, in whose representation negative campaign ads against Gingrich in Iowa were aired.
 Perry said,
 Bachmann, who had won the Ames Straw Poll in August,
 They brought him to the Ronald Reagan UCLA medical center,
 According to reports,
 According to the entertainment news Website TMZ, the photographer stopped the vehicle on the opposite side of Sepulveda Boulevard and attempted to take photographs of the police stop before crossing the street and continuing, which caused the California motorcycle officer who was conducting the vehicle stop to give the photographer two warnings to return to the sidewalk.
 According to police authorities, it is unlikely that the driver of the vehicle that hit the photographer will be prosecuted.
 With only eighteen medals available per day, there are several countries that have not made it to the podium.
 The Netherlands, with Anna Jochemsen, who yesterday got the ninth place in the women's Super-G, and Finland, with Katjia Saarinen, in tenth place in the same event.
 Mitchell Gourley, of Australia, won the eleventh place in the men's standing super giant slalom. The Czech competitor, Oldrich Jelinek, finished in the twelfth place in the men's sitting super giant slalom.
 Arly Velásquez, from Mexico, got the fifteenth position in the men's Super-G. Adam Hall, from New Zealand, finished in the ninth place in the men's Super-G.
 The skiing group of the male with visual impairment, Maciej Krezel, and his guide, Anna Ogarzynska, from Poland, finished in the thirteenth place in the Super-G. Jong Seork Park of Korea, finished in the twenty-fourth place in the men's sitting.
 After the earthquake in 2010, the UN peacekeeping forces arrived in Haiti and were blamed for spreading the disease, as the first cases were registered in the vicinity of their camp.
 According to the demand, the UN camp's waste was not sanitized correctly, which caused the bacteria to enter the Artibonite River, one of the most caudal of Haiti.
 Previo al arribo de las fuerzas de paz, Haití no había enfrentado problemas asociados a la enfermedad desde el siglo XIX.
 The Institute for Justice and Democracy in Haiti has mentioned the existence of independent trials that point to the Nepalese UN peacekeeping battalion as the one that involuntarily introduced the disease to Haiti.
 According to Danielle Lantagne,
 Hamilton confirmed that the Howard University hospital had admitted the patient and that his condition was stable.
 The patient had been in Nigeria,
 The hospital has respected the infection control protocol, including the patient's distancing from others to prevent possible infections.
 Previously to Los Simpson, Simon had several jobs in other television shows,
 In the eighty s, he collaborated in several programs,
 In 1989, he helped with the creation of the Simpsons, with Brooks and Groening, and was responsible for the hiring of the show's first writing team.
 Though he left the show in 1993,
 With prior knowledge, the Chinese news agency, Xinhua, had reported the hijacking of an airplane.
 According to subsequent reports,
 The preliminary reports indicate that the aircraft was diverted back to Afghanistan after it was denied permission to make an emergency landing in Urumqi.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, which has an old fleet that receives poor maintenance,
 The sanctions imposed at the international level have translated into the impossibility of acquiring new aircraft.
 Three people died and three others were injured in a police helicopter accident that occurred earlier this week.
 Last month, Iran experienced one of its worst airline disasters in years when a plane heading to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 passengers on board.
 The same month, another passenger plane overshot a runway in Mashhad and crashed into a wall, killing 17.
 Aerosmith cancelled the remaining concerts of their tour.
 The band had scheduled a tour of the U S. and Canada that would end on September 16.
 The reason for the cancellation was Steven Tyler's injury.
 After both players held all the services of the set, Murray lost the first by sudden death.
 Well, Del Potro did take an early lead in the second set,
 At that point in the match, Del Potro had to receive treatment on his shoulder, but he managed to return to the game.
 The program began at 8:30 p.m. local time.
 Recognized national singers interpreted bhajans, or devotional songs, at the feet of Shri Shyam.
 The singer Sanju Sharma opened the event, and was followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary.
 After that, Lakkha Singh came to the front to sing the bhajans.
 Baba Shyam was honored with 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog, which, in the Hindu religion, consists of 56 different edibles, such as sweets, fruits, nuts, dishes, among others, which are served as an offering to the god.
 In addition, Lakkha Singh interpreted the chhappan bhog bhajan along with the singer Raju Khandewak.
 On Thursday, at the opening presentation of the Tokyo Game Show, Satoru Iwata, president of Nintendo, revealed the design of the controller for the new Nintendo Revolution console that the company will be launching.
 So, like with a remote control,
 This will allow players to control actions and movements in Video games, through the movement of the device by air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella no logró mantener el control of the vehicle and abandoned the race shortly after it began.
 Fernando Alonso, his teammate, had the lead during most of the race, but had to put an end to it just after his pit stop, surely due to the fact that his right tire was seriously doblado.
 Michael Schumacher abandoned the race shortly after Alonso, due to a suspension failure, caused by the numerous battles during the race.
 According to a transcript of the press conference,
 Every time we did this,
 Approximately 3 minutes after takeoff, a camera inside the tank showed numerous pieces of insulating foam falling off the fuel tank.
 In any event,
 N. Wayne Hale Jr., the head of NASA's shuttle program, stated that the foam had fallen off in a way that was not a concern.
 Approximately one minute later, the wind had reached 70 kilometers per hour.
 And I saw two people in wheelchairs,
 In addition, NHK indicated that the Kashiwazaki-Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 The Hokuriku Electric Power Co declared that the earthquake did not cause any incidents and that reactors 1 and 2 of its Shika nuclear power plant were shut down.
 Around 9,400 homes in the region are without water,
 Some routes were damaged, train service was disrupted in the affected areas, and the Noto airport in Ishikawa Prefecture remains closed.
 A bomb was detonated at the door of the governor's office.
 Three more bombs were detonated in the vicinity of government buildings in a two-hour span.
 Well, there are reports that the official death toll is eight,
 They found concentrations of cyanuric acid and melamine in the urine samples of animals that had died after eating contaminated pet food.
 The researchers indicated that the two compounds react with each other to give rise to crystals that can obstruct kidney function.
 The specialists detected the formation of crystals in the orin of the felines, by the incorporation of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 When compared through the use of infrared spectroscopy,
 No, I don't know if you've noticed,
 Still, the countries of Central America,
 And I thought,
 The only thing I say to people is that we treat you the same way we treat each other.
 A proposed law was dictated by the governor of California, Arnold Schwarzenegger, which does not allow the sale or rental of violent Video games to minors.
 The bill requires that violent Video games sold in the state of California be labeled with a warning label that reads,
 The Attorney General, Kier Starmer QC,
 Huhne has resigned, and Ed Davey MP will replace him in the cabinet. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take over the role of business minister that Davey vacated.
 The 16th of February is the date that Huhne and Pryce are due to appear before the Westminster magistrates court.
 Nicholas Alden and Zachary Cuddeback,
 Edgar Veguilla suffered injuries to his arm and jaw, while Kristoffer Schneider required facial reconstruction surgery.
 The Uka's weapon jammed while aiming at the head of a fifth man. Schneider suffers permanent pain, he can't see with one of his eyes, he's missing part of his skull, and his face had to be reconstructed with titanium.
 Schneider testified via a virtual link from a U S . Air Force base in his home country.
 Carpanedo participated in two individual races of the championship apart from the Wednesday competition.
 The first was the slalom, in which he got a DNF, along with 36 of the 116 participants in that race.
 In her other event, the giant slalom,
 Four category sentadas no lograron completar sus carreras and a total of 45 participants of 117 in the Slalom Gigante no reached the classification in the race.
 Madhya Pradesh police were able to recover the laptop and the cell phone.
 We have arrested five individuals who abused the Swiss woman,
 Baba, Bhutha, Rampro, Gaza, and Vishnu Kanjar are the imputed.
 According to the superintendent of police, Chandra Shekhar Solanki, the accused appeared before the court with their faces covered.
 Despite the fact that there were three people inside the house at the time of the car's impact,
 No obstante, the driver suffered severe head injuries.
 The highway where the accident occurred was temporarily closed while emergency services removed the driver of the red Audi TT.
 At first, he was transferred to the James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth.
 Then he was transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Since then, Adekoya has been in the Edinburgh County Court, accused of the murder of her son.
 Well, although she's under custody awaiting trial,
 It's a common practice in other parts of the UK, but as Scottish justice works in a different way, the courts considered publishing the photographs to be potentially damaging.
 The professor Pamela Ferguson,
 The office of the crown, which is in charge of the prosecutions,
 According to the information that leaked, the document will deal with the border conflict, which Palestine intends to resolve based on the boundaries that existed prior to the Middle East war of 1967.
 Other topics that were also addressed, according to the report, include the future status of Jerusalem, which both nations consider sacred, and the issue of the Jordan Valley.
 Israel insists on a constant military presence in the valley for ten years once the agreement is signed, while PA only accepts five.
 During the pest control supplemental trial, the rangers had to supervise the shooters closely,
 Within a union between NPWS and the National Sporting Association of Australia Inc, volunteers were recruited within the Association's shooting program.
 Mick O'Flynn, who is in charge,
 The day before, Martelly swore in a new nine-member Provisional Electoral Council.
 In four years, it's the fifth Cep of Martelly.
 Last month, a presidential Commission advised the previous CEP to resign,
 The Commission was the way Martelly responded to the widespread demonstrations that began in October against the regime.
 The manifestations, in some cases, violent,
 There have been reported nearly 60 cases of iPods with problems of overheating and burning, which caused six fires and caused minor burns to four people.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade, and Industry of Japan,
 Last week, METI announced that apple had informed them of 34 additional incidents of overheating, which the company categorized as not serious.
 The Ministry said it was a,
 Mariana was shaken by an earthquake at 7:19 am local time.
 There were no reports of damage.
 As well, the Pacific Tsunami Warning Center reported no tsunami indicators.
 In Manila, the capital of the Philippines, a former police officer seized a bus and held hostage the tourists who had just come from Hong Kong.
 Rolando Mendoza opened fire with his M16 against the foreign visitors.
 Several hostages have been rescued, and, so far, at least six have been confirmed dead.
 So the six rehns, among them children and the elderly,
 Later, the photographers took the place of an old woman because she needed to go to the bathroom.
 Liggins followed the same path as his father and began studying medicine.
 She trained as a midwife and worked at the Auckland women's hospital.
 Liggins began her research into premature birth in her spare time, while working at the hospital.
 Her study showed that fetal lung maturation could be sped up by administering a hormone.
 Xinhua reported on Wednesday that government investigators had recovered the black box recorders.
 The wrestlers, companions of Luna,
 Tommy Dreamer said,
 Dustin Runnels declared,
 Between 2008 and 2010,
 Julia Gillard, interim Prime Minister,
 The 34% of those who shared this view want Isabel II to be the last queen of Australia.
 At one end of the survey,
 The Olympic gold medallist had to swim the 100 and 200 metres freestyle, and three relays, at the Commonwealth games, but his fitness has been questioned following his complaints.
 No medicines have been allowed to relieve the pain, because they are forbidden in the games.
 On January 25, Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer science professor at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest prime number that has ever been known.
 Many people have verified the finding using various types of hardware and software, and it was made public at the beginning of February and was made public on Tuesday.
 Perhaps, comets have served as a source of water and organic matter to our planet,
 The expectation of scientists is to understand how planets originate, in particular, ours, given that comets have crashed into the earth a long time ago.
 Cuomo, a 53-year-old, assumed office as governor at the beginning of the year and last month signed a bill that allows people of the same sex to marry.
 He called it political gossip and nonsense.
 It is rumored that he will run for President in 2016.
 NextGen is a system that, according to the Federal Aviation Administration, would reduce the distances of air routes, which would save millions of gallons of fuel per year, as well as carbon emissions.
 Employs satellite technology, in contrast to the old terrestrial radar technology, in order to enable air traffic controllers to detect aircraft with greater precision and to provide pilots with more accurate data.
 No additional transportation will be implemented, and the trains will not stop at Wembley.
 Due to the concern generated by the possible lack of transportation,
 On Thursday, the journal Science reported on the discovery of a new species of bird in the Ecuadorian Galapagos Islands.
 Experts from the University of Princeton, in the USA, and from Uppsala, in Sweden, have revealed that the new species evolved in just two generations, even though it was thought it would take much longer, because of reproduction between an endemic Darwin's finch, Geospiza fortes, and a migratory cactus finch, Geospiza conirostris.
 Gold can take on all kinds of forms and curl up into tiny figures.
 Not only can it be hammered and rolled into sheets,
 And it can be made very thin and stick to another metal.
 You can make a pH indicator using red cabbage juice.
 The color of the juice will be altered depending on how acidic or basic the chemical is.
 The number of hydrogen ions,
 A hydrogen ion is the result of stripping a proton from an electron.
 Mix the two powders together,
 There will be a reaction between the moisture in his hands and the outer layers of his skin, which will feel strange to the touch and form a sort of armor.
 The cities of Harappa and Mohenjo-Daro had toilets with flushing in almost every house, which connected to a sophisticated drainage system.
 In some of the Minoan cities of Crete and Santorini, Greece, there were vestiges of sewer systems.
 Also, there were public baths in ancient Egypt, Persia, and China.
 When one communicates with someone who is thousands of miles away,
 The satellite in space receives the call and then,
 The satellite was sent into space via a rocket. Scientists use telescopes in space, given that the light from the earth's atmosphere distorts some of the light and view we have.
 A rocket, more than one hundred feet tall, is needed to carry a satellite or telescope into outer space.
 The wheel has modified the world in surprising ways.
 Today we have many means of transportation, such as the railroad or the automobile, among many others.
 Below, there are more moderate-sized felines that feed on medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes and deer.
 Finally, there are many small felines,
 The secret of his success is the concept of niche: each feline has a particular function, which prevents it from competing with others.
 Lions are the most social of cats,
 Herds are formed by one to three adult males of the same family,
 Generally, the females are closely related,
 The herds of lions have the same behavior as those of wolves or dogs, with whom they have a surprising similarity,
 The tiger has the ability to climb,
 The tiger is of the same genus as the lion, leopard, and jaguar.
 The tiger's roar is not a full sonorous roar like that of the lion, but, on the contrary, like a prayer of words spoken in growls and cries.
 Ocelots enjoy eating small creatures.
 Scientists believe that ocelots track and find animals to eat,
 And they have very good night vision,
 When a small group of living beings (a small population) separates from the main one from which it came,
 The new environment counts on distinct resources and competitors, and therefore, a new population will need characteristics or adaptations different from those it had before to be a strong competitor.
 No changes have occurred in the original population, which still needs the same adaptations as in the past.
 As time goes by,
 Finally, after millions or even billions of years, the two populations will look so different that it will be impossible to classify them as the same species.
 This process receives the name of speciation, which simply means the development of new species, and is an ineludible consequence and a fundamental part of evolution.
 Plants generate the oxygen that people breathe and absorb the carbon dioxide that people exhale.
 The food of plants is generated with solar energy, thanks to photosynthesis. Besides, they offer us shade.
 With plants, we build our houses,
 The Mosasaurus was the Alpha predator of its time,
 And his huge, sharp teeth,
 No, we don't have the security, but it could have had the viperine.
 Atacaba also to any creature that entered the water,
 Well, the majority of that food would be quite familiar to us, but the Romans also ate some rather unusual items at banquets, like wild boar, peacock, snails, and even a type of rodent called the porcupine.
 Another thing in which they differed was that the humble people and women ate sitting on a chair, while the wealthy enjoyed sharing banquets and throwing themselves on the ground while they ate.
 It is not possible that the recipes of ancient Rome included foods that arrived in Europe from America or Asia centuries later.
 But they had no maize,
 The Babylonians built for each of their gods a central temple considered his home.
 People brought sacrifices to the gods,
 The temples have an open courtyard and then a inner sanctum that only the priests could enter.
 In other cases, special pyramid-shaped towers, called ziggurats, were built as part of the temples.
 The top of the tower was a special sanctuary for its deity.
 In the midst of the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not of major importance.
 The Hebrew families spent most of their time out of doors.
 Women cooked in the patio,
 In the land of Canaan there were no great forests,
 Very few inhabitants lived in Greenland. According to the Norse Sagas, Erik the Red was exiled from Iceland for murder and, during a trip he made further west, he discovered the island and gave it its name.
 Still, without prejudice to their discovery,
 Well, each country,
 If you've seen the movie National treasure,
 No, it's not.
 The Declaration of Independence has written on its reverse the phrase,
 Though it is not known with certainty who wrote it,
 Therefore, it is probable that the annotation was added only as a label.
 Well, the landings carried out during the day,
 His government was in the hands of the French of Vichy,
 On August 15, 1940, the so-called Dragon operation was launched, through which the Allies invaded Southern France.
 In just two weeks, the American and French forces had liberated the South of France and were moving on to Germany.
 One can define a civilization as a specific culture of which a large group of people live and work together,
 The term civilization derives from the Latin civilis, which means civil, and relates both to the word civis, of the same language, which means citizen, and to civitas, which means city or city state, and which, besides, determines in some way the size of the society.
 The city-state is the precursor of the nation. A culture of civilization implies a prolonged generational transmission of knowledge, a durable cultural legacy, and a homogeneous propagation.
 Minority cultures tend to disappear without leaving any relevant historical traces, and they fail to be recognized as civilizations.
 During the war of the Revolution, the thirteen States formed, at first, an ineffective central government under the Articles of Confederation, in which Congress was the only component.
 And given that the Congress had no power to levy taxes,
 Nor was he empowered to annul fiscal laws or tariffs between states.
 The articles demanded the unanimous approval of all the states to proceed to their amendment, and the states gave so little importance to the central government that their representatives used to absent themselves.
 The Italian national football team, along with the German national team, is the second team with the most victories in the world and won the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Among the sports that are most practiced are football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby, cycling, ice hockey, and Formula 1 racing.
 Winter sports are more popular in the northern areas, with athletes participating in international tournaments and Olympic events.
 There are about 7,000 Islands in Japan,
 Due to the conglomerate of Islands that it contains, Japan is often referred to as an Archipelago, from a geographical point of view.
 The history of Taiwan dates back to the fifteenth century, when European sailors who sailed through the area recorded the name of the island as Ilha Formosa, which means beautiful island.
 The establishment, in 1624, by the Dutch East India company, of a base in the South-West of Taiwan, gave rise to a transformation in the aboriginal method of producing grain, with the use of Chinese labour to work in their rice and sugar plantations.
 The Qing dynasty Army (1644-1912) took control of the northern and western coastal region of Taiwan in 1683 and declared Taiwan as a province of the Qing dynasty in 1885.
 In 1895, after being defeated during the First Sino-Japanese War, the Qing government adhered to the Treaty of Shimonoseki, through which it ceded sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, who retained control of the island until 1945.
 Machu Picchu counts three capital constructions: Intihuatana, the temple of the sun and the one of the three windows.
 Most of the buildings have been reconstructed at the ends of the complex so that tourists can see how they originally looked.
 By 1976,
 To illustrate, the most common format of still photography globally is 35 mm, which was the most commonly used film size towards the end of the analogue era.
 Today it's still being produced,
 Indeed, the 35 mm format is somewhat confusing, since its dimensions are 36 mm wide by 24 mm high.
 Therefore it is said that the dimensional ratio of this format (to divide by twelve in order to calculate the simplest ratio of integers) is equivalent to 3:2.
 Many typical formats,
 The rule of the thirds, which has been the subject of constant jokes and has been ridiculed many times, is a simple pattern that generates dynamism while allowing for some order to the images.
 Indicates the most effective position for the central object is the intersection of the horizontal and vertical lines that divide the image into thirds.
 During this phase of European history, the Catholic Church, which had accumulated wealth and power, was questioned.
 For more than a millennium, Christianity had united the European states,
 His power, present everywhere, affected all, from the monarch to the plebeian.
 One of the most important principles of Christianity is that wealth should be used to relieve suffering and poverty, and that the funds of the church should be reserved for that specific function.
 The central dome of the church had stood for more than a millennium, and this concentration of power and money made many wonder if this principle was being respected.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began a naval blockade of Germany.
 Well, the strategy, which involved the interruption of vital military and civilian supplies, was successful, but it violated generally recognized international law and was contemplated in several international agreements of the last two centuries.
 Britain extracted international waters in complete sectors of the ocean to block the entrance of ships, even putting neutral vessels at risk.
 But having received a reduced response,
 During the decade of the nineteen twenty s,
 After seeing the horrors and atrocities of the first World War,
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to take a job at Edison's company in New York.
 He arrived in the U S. with four cents, a book of poems, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor,
 Each dynasty had its own name.
 Each dynasty was followed by a period of instability, with provinces divided. The most famous was the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years, between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 During these stages, a bloody war erupted between many nobles who were disputing the throne.
 One of the most bloody periods in the history of ancient China was the Three Kingdoms period, where thousands of people died in a struggle to occupy the throne of the great Palace in Xi'an.
 There are many such political and social consequences, such as the use of the metric system, the displacement of absolutism towards Republicanism, nationalism, and the conviction that the country belongs to the people, not to a single sovereign.
 As well, after the Revolution, the posts were open to all male candidates, which allowed the most ambitious and prestigious to succeed.
 The same happens with the military,
 The French Revolution was also a source of inspiration for many other people of the repressed working class of other countries to face their own revolutions.
 Mahoma se interesaba profundamente en cuestiones más allá de esta vida mundana. Solía visitar una cueva que se hizo conocida como «Hira» en la montaña de «Noor» (luz) para reflexionar.
 The cave in itself, which has lasted through the ages,
 At the summit of one of the mountains north of Mecca,
 And yet,
 Nothing can be more beautiful than the clear sky and the numerous mountains around.
 The only one that still stands is the great pyramid of Giza.
 The great pyramid, erected by the Egyptian people in the third century B. C, is one of the many structures of pyramidal shape and great size constructed to venerate the deceased Pharaoh.
 The Mesopotamian Valley, in Egypt, contains numerous pyramids,
 And many other such,
 The mark of an upward arc looks like a V, and the mark of a downward arc looks like a staple or a square without its bottom edge.
 Arriba means that one should begin at the point,
 The upward movement of the arc generates a softer sound, whereas a downward movement is louder and sharper.
 Sit down and make your own marks with pencil, but do not forget that the marks on the bow instruments have been impressed in that place for a musical purpose, and therefore should be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a mob of market women forced the terrified monarch, Louis XVI,
 They rode back to Paris in a carriage,
 The mob forced the King and the queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 At a certain moment, a participant in the revolt shook the head of a Royal guard executed in Versailles in front of the queen, who was in a panic.
 The Filipino people paid the costs of the U S . imperialism in conquering the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial regime in order to pay most of the bonds' interest and principal that fluctuated in the name of the Philippine government in the Wall Street banks.
 From now on, the super profits derived from the prolonged exploitation of the Filipino people would constitute the principal gains of U S . imperialism.
 To understand the Templars,
 The period of European history in which these events took place is commonly known as the High Middle Ages, between the eleventh, twelfth, and thirteenth centuries.
 The early Middle Ages were preceded by the early Middle Ages and were followed by the late Middle Ages, which, by convention, ends around the year 1500.
 The technological determinism is a concept that comprises, pragmatically, a great variety of ideas, from the impulse or technological imperative to a strict sense of the existence of a underlying logic that drives the destiny of humanity and that relates to the laws of science and how they are embodied in technology.
 Almost all interpretations of technological determinism have in common two general ideas: that technological development in itself unfolds along a path independent of any cultural or political influence, and that, at the same time, technology has effects on societies that are inherent and not socially conditioned.
 One could argue, for example,
 However, a national road system is not viable economically for a reduced volume of automobiles, with which new manufacturing techniques are being designed to reduce the costs of owning a vehicle.
 The massive use of automobiles also generates a greater incidence in traffic accidents, which leads to the development of new techniques in the field of health to repair the damaged bodies.
 The element of cultural determinism was very much present in romanticism, according to scholars like Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the context of Romanticism, geography molded people, and, with the passage of time, customs and cultures developed that were in harmony with the localization of that society,
 As well as Paris is known as the city of fashion,
 Her fame as a center of luxury began approximately in 400 B. C. and extended until approximately 1100 C. E.
 During the twelfth century, its status decayed,
 The title of capital of fashion was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 The peak of the Gothic style took place in the period between the tenth and fourteenth centuries.
 At first, the way of dressing received great influence from Byzantine culture in the East.
 No obstante, due to the slowness of communication channels, Western styles could be delayed by as much as 25 to 30 years.
 Towards the end of the Middle Ages, Western Europe began to develop a style of its own. One of the most significant advances of that era was that, as a result of the Crusades, people began to use buttons to fasten their garments.
 Agriculture of subsistence
 Agriculture of subsistence is a simple, generally organic practice that combines the use of regionally originated seed stocks with crop rotation or other comparatively simple methods to maximize production.
 Historically, a large part of the main activity of the farmers was subsistence agriculture, which is still practiced in many developing countries.
 Subcultures congregate individuals with similar ideas and feelings of marginality from social standards and give them the possibility of generating a sense of identity.
 There are many factors that can distinguish subcultures,
 The features that distinguish a subculture may be linguistic, aesthetic, sexual, geographic, or related to religion or politics, or a mixture of factors.
 Integrants of a subculture,
 One of the most commonly used mechanisms to graph the importance of socializing is to analyze the few and lamentable cases of children who, through negligence, misfortune, or intentional abuse, were not socialized by adults during their growth.
 Some of these children are confined by people,
 It is possible that the feral children suffered traumatic situations or severe childhood abuse before they were abandoned or ran away.
 It is said that others were reared by animals and that some have lived by themselves in the wilderness.
 When the wild child is reared exclusively by animals other than human beings, he presents behaviors almost identical to those of the specific animal that cared for him, as well as his fear or indifference towards people.
 Even though project-based learning should facilitate that process and make it more interesting, the scaffolding goes a little bit further.
 The andamiaje is not a learning technique,
 The andamiaje can be presented in a real or virtual format.
 Virtual andamiajes are incorporated into the software and their function is to question, stimulate, or explain procedures that may have been complex for the student to do on his own.
 There are a wide variety of reasons.
 No child should ever have to grow up in an environment where there is no love, no care, and no education.
 We can see that the foster care system provides a safe environment for these children.
 The goal of our foster care system is to provide safe homes, loving caregivers, sustained education, and reliable medical care.
 The goal of foster care is to meet all of the needs that were not being met in the child's previous home.
 Internet une and mixture of components of mass communication and between people.
 The different features that Internet presents open up new dimensions from the perspective of the concept of uses and rewards.
 For example, learning and socialization are cited as significant incentives for Internet use.
 During a study of user reactions to Websites conducted by Eighmey and McCord (1998), the authors also detected the terms personal participation and durable relationships as new motivational factors.
 Through the recording of videos,
 Specifically, it is argued that, through the proper reading of their microexpressions, it is possible to detect if a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his article, the President's speech, explained how those who cannot understand speech because of brain damage can nevertheless evaluate sincerity with precision.
 Even suggests that the skills to interpret human behavior can be shared with animals, like dogs.
 Through the works of research of the twentieth century it has been demonstrated that there are two groups of genetic variation: the hidden and the manifest.
 The process of mutation incorporates a new genetic variation,
 Segregation and Recombination shuffle the variation from one generation to the next.
 In the savanna, it is not easy for a primate whose digestive system is the same as ours to satisfy its amino acid needs with the vegetable resources at its disposal.
 More, no doing it,
 Proteins present in leaves and legumes would have been the source of the most easily accessible vegetable resources, but they are not easily digestible for primates like us, except when they are cooked.
 Instead, the food derived from animals,
 In the end, it should not surprise us if our own predecessors solved their own protein problems in the same way that chimpanzees do today.
 The interruption of sleep consists in awakening oneself intentionally during the normal period of sleep and then falling asleep again after a short time.
 This can be easily accomplished with a more or less gentle alarm clock that will cause him to wake up again.
 The registration is an additional requirement for the visa process. In some countries, you will have to register your presence and the address of your accommodation with the local authorities.
 Other options that are based on biological rhythm consist in drinking a lot of liquid, especially water or tea, known as diuretic, before going to bed, which will force him to get up to urinate.
 The level of inner peace that a person enjoys is inversely related to the amount of tension that there is in his body and in his spirit.
 The lower the tension, the more positive the life force with which we count.
 We all can reach enlightenment.
 Well, the foundations of Tibetan Buddhism are the teachings of the Buddha,
 In general, Laism is very simple.
 In Kundalini Yoga, the Kundalini energy (illumination) is activated with yoga postures, breathing practices, Mantras, or visualizations.
 Through the visualization of deities,
 The cooperation between the USSR and the USA was the result of facing a common enemy, Germany, during the Second World War.
 A two years after the end of the war,
 It would extend for the next 40 years and would be fought, really, through proxy wars, in battlefields from Africa to Asia, in Afghanistan, Cuba, among many other places.
 Due to the fact that by September 17, 1939, Polish defense was already broken,
 No obstante, these plans fell into disuse almost overnight, when more than 800,000 combatants of the Soviet Red Army entered and formed the Belorussian and Ukrainian fronts, after invading the Eastern regions of Poland, infringing the Treaty of Riga, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral agreements.
 To use ships to transport goods is a much more effective way to transport large numbers of people and goods across the oceans.
 Since always, the function of the navy has been to guarantee that its country maintains the faculty of transporting its population and merchandise, while at the same time, interfering with the enemy's capacity to do the same.
 The campaign in the North Atlantic during the Second World War offers one of the clearest and most recent examples of this.
 At the same time, the German armada, using mainly submarines,
 If the Allies had not succeeded, Germany could have taken over Britain, as well as the rest of Europe.
 Apparently, goats were first domesticated,
 With the purpose of easily obtaining their milk, hair, meat, and skin,
 Generally, the domestic goats were gathered into herds that wandered over the hills or other grazing areas, often cared for by goat herders who were usually children or teenagers, similar to the more popular shepherd.
 In England, the railways had already been installed by the sixteenth century.
 Aun when the rails of the cars were made of simple parallel boards of wood, they enabled the horses that drew them to attain a greater speed and to haul heavier loads than on the somewhat more rugged roads of the day.
 The incorporation of sleepers to keep the rails in place occurred quite early. Nevertheless, they gradually came to realize that the rails would be more efficient if they were lined with iron on the top.
 This became a common practice, although the iron caused greater wear on the wooden wheels of the cars.
 Eventually, the wooden wheels were replaced with iron ones, and in 1767, they began to use solid iron rails.
 The first form of transportation that was known was walking.
 And their predecessors, the Australopithecus,
 Well, if you look at the Australopithecines,
 We can start to live a life that's more friendly to the planet,
 But in many cases,
 It is evident that the world has suffered great changes,
 After being approved by Congress on July 4,
 Between one hundred and two hundred copies were made during the night,
 John Nixon read the document for the first time in the patio of the hall of independence on July 8.
 On the 6th of July, a copy was sent to George Washington, who ordered it to be read to his Army in New York on the 9th of July.
 The 25 Dunlap copies, as we know, are the oldest surviving copies of the document.
 A lot of paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and are still alive today.
 Many people don't see them as dinosaurs,
 However, there are many characteristics in birds that still resemble dinosaurs.
 They have scaly extremities and claws, they lay eggs and move on their hind legs like the T-Rex.
 Currently, almost all computers work on the basis of manipulating data Encoded under the Binary system.
 A Binary number can only have one of two values,
 The internal poisoning may not be evidenced at once.
 The most clear indicator of internal poisoning may be found with an open bottle of medicines or chemical toxic cleaning products.
 Read the label to get specific first aid information for that specific poison.
 Entomologists use the term insect parasite in a formal sense to refer to this group of arthropods.
 The word comes from its old relation to bedbugs,
 Bedbugs and bedbugs are nidicolous,
 The number of registered cases of multiple sclerosis in the U S.A. amounts to about 400,000, which makes it the most frequent neurological disease among young and middle-aged adults.
 The central nervous system,
 Studies have indicated that women are twice as likely as men to suffer from Endometriosis.
 A couple could conclude that raising a baby would not be the best thing for them or for the child.
 These couples could choose to plan for the adoption of a baby.
 In an adoption, the biological parents relinquish their parental rights so that a different couple can take care of the child.
 The goal of science is to decipher the way the world works through the scientific method.
 No, it's not an experiment, it's a test that's used to rule out one or more of the possible hypotheses, by asking questions and making observations that guide the scientific research.
 The focus of both naturalists and philosophers was placed on the classical works,
 The thoughts of Aristotle, especially the questions of science, even psychology, were accepted.
 As the dominion of the Greek language was decaying,
 Frequently, many rhythms present in physiological processes and in behavior depend decisively on internal cycles and their production through biological clocks.
 Periodic rhythms, which are not only reactions to regular external stimuli, have been recorded in almost all living things, even in bacteria, fungi, plants, and animals.
 Biological clocks oscillate in a self-sustained way and have a cyclical free running period, even if there are no external stimuli.
 One of the key indicators that DNA was a genetic material was the experiment conducted by Hershey and Chase.
 Hershey and Chase inserted their own DNA into a bacterium using Phage, or viruses.
 They did two experiments,
 Depending on the type of mutation,
 Only the mutations in germ cells can be transmitted to the children, while those that occur in other parts can cause cell death or cancer.
 The nature-based tourism usually attracts people who are interested in visiting natural areas to enjoy the scenery, which includes the wildlife,
 Some examples of possible activities in the place are: hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching and visiting parks, and studying information about the ecosystem.
 One example is to visit, take photographs, and learn about orangutans in Borneo.
 Every morning, people leave small towns in their cars to go to work, and they usually cross paths with others whose jobs are in the same place they've just left.
 In this dynamic transfer launcher, everyone is somehow connected to a system of transportation based on the use of private automobiles, and they support it.
 Currently, scientists argue that this massive carbon economy has deprived the biosphere of one of its regular states that has contributed to the evolution of humanity for the last two million years.
 Everyone is part of society and uses transportation systems, and almost everyone complains about them.
 In developed countries, it's rare to hear similar levels of complaint about the quality of water or the collapse of bridges.
 Why do transport systems fail?
 The flow of traffic is the study of the individual movement of drivers and vehicles between two points and of the interactions between them.
 It is not an easy task to study the flow of traffic,
 There is a tendency, however,
 In order to graphically illustrate the flow of circulation, relations were established between the three most important elements: (1) flow, (2) density, and (3) velocity.
 These relationships facilitate both planning and design as well as the operations of the vials.
 The first creatures to take to the air were insects.
 Most insects have the advantage of being able to fold their wings back,
 This gives them a wider range of possible small places to hide from predators.
 At present, the Anisoptera and Ephemeroptera are the only insects incapable of folding their wings.
 Millennia ago, a man named Aristarchus commented that the solar system rotated around the sun.
 But there were others who believed the opposite,
 This seems to make sense, since on earth we don't perceive its movement, right?
 The Amazon River is the largest and second longest river in the world.
 In addition, the Amazon is the widest river in the world, in some places with a width of up to six miles.
 Of the total water from the world's rivers that flows into the oceans,
 The great Amazon River has an extension of 6,387 kilometers,
 Well, the pyramids of stone continued to be built until the end of the Old Kingdom,
 The old Egyptian of the New Empire,
 With approximately 800 inhabitants, the Vatican City is the smallest independent country in the world and the one with the smallest population.
 The Italian language is used in the Vatican city, both to write its norms and to issue its official communications.
 The language that is spoken daily by the majority of those who work within the state is also Italian, and the use of Latin is generally reserved for religious ceremonies.
 All of the citizens who live in the Vatican City adhere to the Roman Catholic religion.
 The basic chemicals, such as gold, silver, and copper, have been known since antiquity, because all of them can be found in nature in their original form and are relatively easy to extract with rudimentary tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle developed the theory that everything is made up of a combination of one or more of four elements: earth, water, air, and fire.
 The states of matter were solid, liquid, gaseous, and plasma,
 The alloys are basically a combination of two or more metals.
 Since then,
 Also it is possible that there are alloys with the presence of small quantities of elements, such as carbon, which are not metallic.
 Everything in the universe is made of matter,
 The size of atoms is so immeasurably small that the period at the end of this sentence could contain billions of them.
 Therefore, when it was invented, the pencil gained many friends.
 Unfortunately, because of the implementation of new writing methods, the pencil is used less and has lost its status.
 Today, people write messages on the screens of their computers.
 What will become of the keyboard when something new comes along?
 The atomic bomb works on the principle that it takes energy to make a nucleus with a lot of protons and neutrons.
 It's similar to what happens when you roll a heavy car up a hill.
 The nuclei of some atoms are unstable,
 The surface of the moon is made up of rocks and dust, and its outer layer is called the crust.
 The bark is about 70 km thick on the near side and about 100 km thick on the far side.
 It is thinner under the lunar seas and thicker under the high lands.
 It is possible that there are more seas in the nearby side due to the fact that their crust is thinner, which facilitated the lava to ascend to the surface.
 Theories of content focus on what is it that people are attracted to or like.
 These doctrines hold that people have certain needs or desires that have been internalized as they grew to maturity.
 These theories analyze what causes certain people to want the things they do and what factors in their environment cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two theories of very well-known are the hierarchy of needs, of Maslow, and the two-factor theory, of Hertzberg.
 In general, there are two types of behavior when managers begin to lead their former colleagues.
 It costs managers of this category
 In the other extreme,
 And so,
 This way of acting ends up distancing the leaders from the rest of the team.
 The same standards of excellence that managing conventional teams apply to virtual teams.
 Frequently, the members of a virtual team act as a point of contact for their closest physical team.
 Generally, they enjoy greater autonomy than the members of a traditional group, thanks to the fact that it is possible for their teams to meet according to different time zones, which, for example, could not be understood by the local management.
 The existence of an actual invisible team,
 The «invisible team» is the group in charge of the management and to which each member reports. It is the one that sets the standards for each member.
 One of the purposes of applying the theoretical concepts of organizational learning is to promote innovation.
 When the total of the available resources are used in an appropriate manner in the operational departments of an organization, space is generated for creativity and ingenuity.
 The process of a team working together to overcome a difficulty,
 For an organization to be innovative, leadership must first create a culture of innovation, along with a shared knowledge and organizational learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous enfoque as a method used to help organizations achieve a higher level of performance.
 The neurobiological data offer factual evidence for a theoretical approach to the investigation of cognition, thereby reducing the field of investigation and conferring greater exactitude.
 The existing correlation between brain pathology and behavior contributes to the research of scientists.
 Since long ago it has been known that several types of brain damage, traumas, injuries and tumors affect behavior and cause changes in mental functions.
 Thanks to the apogee of new technologies, we have the possibility of seeing and investigating structures and processes that occur in the brain that have never been seen before.
 This gives us abundant information and material to develop simulation models, which favor our understanding of mental processes.
 Well, it's a big deal.
 The investigation in the field of IA supposes the development of machines in order to automatize tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Amongst others, the monitoring, planning and programming, the ability to respond to customer diagnoses and queries, as well as the recognition of faces, writing and voice.
 These issues have become separate disciplines,
 The system of artificial intelligence is now often used in the sectors of the economy, medicine, engineering, and the military, in the same way it was incorporated into various applications of video games and personal computers.
 A study trip is an important part of every class. It is very common for a teacher to want to take her students to places that cannot be reached by bus.
 The solution comes from technology,
 Sharing a virtual field trip is also a great way to reflect on a field trip and share experiences with future classes.
 For example, every year, the Bennet school in North Carolina designs a Website about their trip to the state capital, and every year the Website is updated, but the previous versions are kept Online in the form of a scrapbook.
 Blogs can also contribute to improving students' writing. Although students often begin their Blogging experience with poor grammar and spelling, this generally changes as they become more accustomed to the presence of an audience.
 Because students are often the most critical readers,
 The Blogging, as well,
 Blogs are a resource that inspires collaboration and encourages students to go beyond the typical school day.
 The proper use of Blogs «can empower students to be more analytical and critical, through active response to Internet content, they can define their own perspectives on the context of other's writings, in addition to establishing their own perspectives on specific topics» (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the bilingual capital of Canada and has a variety of museums and art galleries that exhibit the history and current state of the country.
 The Niagara falls are further south,
 All of these aspects, among others, are what stand out to Ontarians as intrinsically Canadian.
 The great areas farther North are sparsely populated,
 To make a population comparison that causes great surprise to many,
 The location of the Islands of East Africa is off the East Coast of that continent, in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is, by far, the largest and a continent in itself if we're talking about wildlife.
 Most of the smaller Islands are independent or associated with France and are popular for their beaches and luxury resorts.
 Islam also was brought to the Islands by the Arabs,
 The point of beginning European influence and colonialism took place in the fifteenth century,
 The region borders the Sahel to the North, and the Atlantic Ocean to the South and West.
 All female visitors are advised to say they are married, regardless of their actual marital status.
 It will also be useful to use a ring.
 Women must realize that cultural differences can cause what they consider to be harassment, and that it is not uncommon for them to be followed, taken by the arm, etc.
 But to reject men and not to defend their position,
 The founders of the modern city of Casablanca were the Berber fishermen during the tenth century BC and the Phoenicians, Romans, and Byzantines used it as a strategic port, called Anfa.
 It was destroyed and rebuilt by the Portuguese with the name of Casa Branca, but in 1755 they abandoned it after the occurrence of an earthquake.
 The city was rebuilt by order of the Moroccan Sultan with the name of Daru l-Badya and the Spanish merchants who installed their businesses in that place called it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring places in all of Morocco to go shopping.
 In the outskirts of the old Medina, there are plenty of places where you can buy traditional Moroccan items, such as earthenware, ceramics, leather goods, water pipes and a whole range of other small items, although everything is geared towards tourists.
 Goma is a tourist destination in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, on the eastern border, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, the lava from the Nyiragongo volcano destroyed Goma and left much of its streets underwater, especially in the center of the city.
 Well, Goma is quite safe,
 And at the same time,
 Within Goma, you can opt to take a boda-boda,
 Hello, plus the fact that it's relatively inaccessible,
 Well, though today, Timbuktu is a poor city,
 In 1990, it was added to the list of world heritage sites in danger,
 One of the most important stops on Henry Louis Gates's special,
 The city contrasts much with the rest of the country,
 The Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in northeastern South Africa and extends along the border with Mozambique in the east, Zimbabwe in the north, and the Crocodile River in the south.
 The park has a surface of 19,500 km2 and is divided into 14 distinct ecozones, in each of which a different wildlife develops.
 This is one of the most important attractions in South Africa and is recognized as the main icon of South Africa's National Parks.
 As in all South African nature reserves, there are daily fees for conservation and access to the park.
 Also, it may be convenient to purchase a Wild Card that allows entry to selected parks in South Africa or to all the National parks in the country.
 The territory of Hong Kong takes its name from the homonymous Island,
 The deployment of buildings that delimit the horizon of Hong Kong has been compared to a graph of light bars that is evidenced by the presence of the waters of Victoria Harbor.
 The best way to enjoy the best views of Hong Kong is to leave the island and head to the Kowloon waterfront.
 It is in the recovered lands of the North Coast of Hong Kong where it is concentrated, densely, its urban development.
 This is the site that British conquerors adopted as their own.
 The Sundarbans are the world's largest mangrove forest,
 The UNESCO has declared the Sundarbans a heritage of humanity.
 But, without prejudice to this, the forests are not only mangroves, but possess some of the last trees that remain of the mighty jungles that once covered the Gangetic plain.
 The Sundarbans comprise an area of 3,850 km2 and nearly a third of its extent is covered by water or swampy areas.
 Since 1966, the Sundarbans have been a temple of wildlife, and it is estimated that there are currently 400 Bengal tigers and about 30,000 spotted deer in the area.
 The buses leave from the station between districts (on the other side of the river) all day long, although most of them, especially those going to the east and to Jakar (also called Bumthang), leave between 6:30 and 7:30 a.m.
 Because buses between districts are often crowded, it is recommended to purchase a ticket a few days in advance.
 Almost all districts have the service of Japanese Coasters, which are comfortable and durable.
 To share a taxi ride is a quick and comfortable way to travel to nearby places, such as Paro (150 ngultrums) and Punakha (200 ngultrums).
 The Oyapock River bridge is a cantilevered structure that crosses it, connecting Oiapoque, a Brazilian city, and Saint-Georges de l'Oyapock, in French Guiana.
 The two towers reach a height of 83 m, with a length of 378 m and two lanes of 3.5 m wide.
 Below the bridge there is a 15-meter space, and although its construction was finished in August 2011, it was not enabled for transit until March 2017.
 The full operation of the bridge is estimated for September of 2017, which is when Brazilian customs controls are expected to be finalized.
 The area that currently constitutes the East of Paraguay was inhabited by the Guaraníes, who were the most important indigenous group in that region and who lived as hunter-gatherers, in addition to practicing subsistence agriculture.
 Each group had its own language,
 Paraguay, formerly known as the Gigantic province of the Indies,
 The Spanish gave inception to the stage of colonization, which extended for three centuries.
 Since Asuncion was founded in 1537, Paraguay has been able to preserve much of its idiosyncrasy and aboriginal identity.
 Argentina is famous for having one of the best teams and the best players of polo in the world.
 The most important tournament of the year takes place in December at the polo fields of Las Cañitas.
 Also other tournaments and inferior matches may be seen in other parts of the year.
 At the Argentine Polo Association Website,
 The value of the Falkland Islands pound,
 There is a single bank in the Islands. You can change your money there. It's opposite the FIC West store in Stanley.
 You can usually pay in pounds sterling,
 There are probably no credit cards accepted in the outer Islands, but you could use British or American money.
 It is practically impossible to change money outside the Falkland Islands, so make sure you do it before you leave.
 Due to the fact that Montevideo is located south of the equator,
 Montevideo is located in the subtropics, with frequent temperatures above 30° C during the summer.
 Though it is very rare that the temperatures are below freezing,
 There are no stations specifically «rainy» or «dry».
 But many of the animals in the park are used to seeing people,
 According to the indications of the parks authorities,
 Without prejudice to how mild they may appear, the truth is that bison, wapiti, elk, bears and practically all large animals can be aggressive.
 Dozens of visitors suffer injuries each year by not maintaining an adequate distance.
 As well, remember that odors attract bears and other wild animals, so you should avoid having or cooking foods that release a lot of aroma and keep the camp clean.
 The capital of Samoa, the city of Apia, is located on the island of Upolu and has just under 40,000 inhabitants.
 Apia se founded in the decade of 1850 and is the capital of Samoa since the year 1959.
 In 1889, the port was the scene of a nefarious naval confrontation when seven German, American, and English ships refused to leave the port.
 They sank all the boats,
 During the war for independence that the Mau movement waged, a peaceful encounter in the city resulted in the assassination of the head of state, Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 There are a number of beaches,
 In the North Harbour district, in the Pacific ocean, are the beaches of North Shore, which stretch from Long Bay in the North, to Devonport in the South.
 The beaches are almost all sand with safe places to swim and most of them have Pohutukawa trees which offer shade.
 In the Waitemata harbor, the beaches of Tamaki drive,
 These are familiar beaches, sometimes very crowded, with numerous and varied shops available on the thing.
 Number one is the most popular local beer,
 Well, there is a great variety of French wines,
 The water from the tap is completely safe to drink, but if you're worried, you can easily find bottled water.
 Australians consider the notion of a black, plain coffee to be foreign.
 Hot chocolate is up to Belgian standards.
 Numerous journeys are made to the Reef during the year,
 In any case,
 Cubomedusas are found near beaches and estuaries from October to April, north of 1770.
 Sharks do exist, but they almost never attack people.
 The ocean is not the place where saltwater crocodiles actively reside.
 The reservation of lodging in advance of the trip gives you the assurance of having a place to sleep when you arrive at your destination.
 Although through them,
 Generally, travel agents offer packages that include breakfast, transfers from and to the airport, and even combined flights and accommodation.
 Also, they may keep the reservation in case you need time to think about the offer, or to get other documents for your destination, like a visa.
 However, any modification or request must be made through the travel agent first, and not directly through the hotel.
 In some festivals,
 If you want to see the action,
 But if you're looking for a more intimate,
 Some festivals have special camping areas,
 If you are going to cross the North of the Baltic in winter,
 Also during cruises to St . Petersburg,
 Normally, casinos make great efforts to maximize the time and money that their customers spend.
 Offer special promotions of food, beverage, and entertainment to keep guests in good spirits and within the facility.
 Although drunkenness affects the judgment,
 Anyone who intends to drive in high latitudes or in mountain passes must plan for the possibility of snow, ice, or low temperatures.
 On roads with ice or snow,
 During a snowstorm,
 In addition, visibility can be reduced by snow,
 On the other hand, in many countries the conditions of ice and snow are normal, and the traffic flows almost without any interruption during the whole year.
 Safaris are probably the greatest tourist attraction in Africa,
 The popular use of the term safari makes reference to overland journeys to see the surprising wildlife of Africa, in particular in the savanna.
 Some animals, like elephants and giraffes,
 Sometimes, lions, cheetahs, and leopards can be shy, so you'll have more of a chance to see them using binoculars.
 The excursion known as a foot safari,
 Between August 24 and September 5,
 The only Asian city to have hosted two Olympic games.
 If you reserved your flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement of the postponement,
 Since the end of March,
 It is expected that most entries to the events will have a cost of between JPY 2500 and JPY 130,000, and that common pases will cost JPY 7,000.
 Planchar the clothes when they are still damp can help to dry them. Many hotels have an iron and a board to lend to travelers, even if one is not in the room.
 If you don't have a flat iron,
 Do not let the cloth get too hot, as it might shrink or, in extreme cases, burn.
 There are different methods for purifying water,
 In some places, it's enough to boil water for a minute,
 Not all filters have the same effectiveness, and if this worries you, you should consider buying bottled water with a seal from a certified company.
 It may happen that travelers meet with plagues of animals of which they have no knowledge in the regions from which they come.
 Pests are capable of ruining food, causing irritation, or in more serious cases, causing allergic reactions, spreading poison, or transmitting infections.
 Infectious diseases, by themselves, or dangerous animals, which can injure or kill individuals by the use of their strength, are not usually included in the category of pests.
 The free purchase of customs duties offers an opportunity to acquire, in certain places, products exempt from duties and taxes.
 Travelers who visit countries with a high tax burden may, at times, save a significant amount of money, particularly on such goods as spirits and tobacco.
 On the Buffalo-Pittsburgh autopista, the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont is the one of the most challenging and frequently runs through remote and solitary terrain.
 If you do not usually drive on rural highways,
 The speed limits are notoriously lower than in the previous and in the following stretches, generally from 35 to 40 mph,
 But, curiously,
 German pastry is of good quality, and in Bavaria, pastries are quite tasty and varied, similar to those made in Austria, its neighbor to the south.
 Common are the fruit pastels, with cooked apples in their interior during the whole year, and cherries and plums that appear in the summer.
 Many of the German products that are baked also have almonds, hazelnuts, and other nuts. In general, popular pastries make an excellent combination with a cup of strong coffee.
 If you're in the mood for small but tasty pastries, try the Berliner, also called Pfannkuchen or Krapfen, depending on the region.
 Curry is a dish based on herbs and spices, and it is served with meat or vegetables.
 We can find curry,
 In the villages of the interior of northern India and Pakistan, it is usual to use yogurt in the curry.
 With 17,000 Islands to choose from, Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that encompasses a wide variety of regional cuisines that are distributed throughout the country.
 No obstante, employed without any other qualifying term, the term tends to refer to the gastronomy originating in the central and eastern regions of the main island of Java.
 The Javanese cuisine, currently available throughout the archipelago, offers a variety of dishes seasoned with simple condiments, with predominance of the favorite aromas of the Javanese, such as peanuts, chili peppers, sugar, and various aromatic herbs.
 The stirrups are the supports for the feet of the riders that hang on both sides of the saddle.
 Well, although they provide greater stability to the rider,
 If a rider is thrown from his horse,
 First of all, most riders use riding boots with a heel that is pointed and quite narrow.
 Additionally, there are saddles, especially English ones, with safety bars that allow the leather of the saddle to break away from its structure if a rider who is thrown off pulls backward.
 Cochamó Valley is the most popular climbing destination in Chile and is known as the Yosemite of South America, with a variety of extensive granite walls and cliffs.
 The peaks also offer impacting views from the peaks. Climbers from all corners of the globe constantly delineate new paths between their walls of potential infinity.
 Sports in descent, like skiing and snowboarding, are popular disciplines that consist in sliding with skis or a board fixed to the feet, on a snowy terrain.
 Skiing is a main activity of travel with many adepts, sometimes called ski lovers, who organize their vacations completely based on skiing at a specific site.
 The idea of skiing is very old,
 As a discipline, alpine skiing dates from no later than the seventeenth century. In 1861, Norwegians inaugurated the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Backpacker skiing: also known as rural skiing, backcountry skiing, or ski touring.
 Well, although they are linked,
 Imagine the ski slope as a hiking trail.
 In satisfactory conditions,
 Europe is a relatively small continent, but with many independent countries. Under normal circumstances, traveling to several countries would mean having to manage visa applications and passport controls several times.
 But Schengen is a single country in this sense.
 Always, provided he moves within this region.
 In the same way, by having a Schengen visa, you do not need to apply for a permit for each of the Schengen countries separately, which saves you time, money and paperwork.
 No criterion universal determines when a manufactured item can be considered an antique.
 The definition varies geographically, where the age limit could be more acute in places like North America than in Europe.
 It may happen that products made by hand are cataloged as antiques, even though they are newer than similar characteristics manufactured in series.
 The reindeer herd constitutes a fundamental means of life among the Laplanders, and the culture related to this commercial activity is important to many who are engaged in other professions.
 Even so, even traditionally,
 Today, many Laplanders work in modern commercial activities.
 Well, although it's used extensively,
 If your destination country is subject to a travel alert, it could affect your medical or cancellation insurance.
 It may be that he wants to consult the recommendations of other governments, but they are meant for their own citizens.
 For example, a North American visitor to the Middle East could face situations different from those of a European or an Arab.
 The travel warnings are just a concise summary of the political situation in another country.
 The points of view that are presented are usually superficial, generic, and oversimplified in comparison with the more detailed information available elsewhere.
 The term severe climate refers, in general, to any risky climatic phenomenon that is capable of causing damage, serious social alterations or the death of people.
 The severe climate can be found in any part of the planet, and there are different types depending on geography, topography, and atmospheric conditions.
 Huricanes, droughts, excessive rains and forest fires are types and consequences of extreme climate, as well as electrical storms, tornadoes, water spouts or cyclones.
 Among the extreme regional and seasonal climatic phenomena we find the winds, the storms of snow, ice or dust.
 It is strongly recommended that travelers inform themselves about any extreme climate risks in the area they are visiting, as this may affect their travel plans.
 Any person who is planning a trip to a country that could be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 It is probable that when searching for a course on hostile zones,
 Normally, a course will cover all the topics that have been dealt with here in much more detail, and, in general, with practical experience.
 A course normally lasts between 2 and 5 days, and includes role-playing, first aid, and even weapons training.
 The books and magazines about survival in the wilderness are common, but publications about war zones are scarce.
 Passengers who have scheduled a gender change surgery in another country must ensure they have valid documentation for the return trip.
 The position of governments regarding the possibility of issuing passports without a gender declaration,
 The disposition of foreign governments to honor these documents varies a great deal.
 Inspections at security checkpoints have become more invasive since September eleventh.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery should not have to pass through the scanners with their dignity and privacy intact.
 The return currents are the flow that recedes from the breaking waves, often on a reef or similar.
 A cause of the submarine topography,
 Most of the deaths occur because of the fatigue that causes the attempt to swim against the current, which is perhaps impossible.
 As soon as I get out of the current,
 To make the attempt to reach some place where he will not be seen again, or, if he has the ability and someone has seen him, it might be best to wait for rescue.
 The impact of returning home occurs before the cultural one,
 Travelers who have easily adapted to a new culture sometimes have a lot of trouble adapting back to their native culture.
 When he returns home after living abroad,
 When you traveled abroad the first time,
 And people may not foresee that tolerance and understanding are also necessary for the returning traveler.
 The light show and the pyramid sound are one of the most interesting things for children in the area.
 In the darkness, you can see the pyramids and contemplate them in silence before the show begins.
 Now, generally, you'll be able to hear the sound of tourists and vendors at all times.
 The Sphinx appears as a background and narrator of a long history.
 Scenes are projected onto the pyramids, and all of them are illuminated.
 The discovery of the Shetland Islands occurred in 1819, and several nations claim them. They have the largest number of bases, reaching sixteen active in 2020.
 The archipelago is 120 kilometers north of the peninsula. The largest island is King George, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Others include Livingston and Deception Islands, where there is a spectacular natural harbor formed by the caldera of a volcano that remains active.
 The land of Ellsworth, whose boundaries are defined by the sea of Bellingshausen, is a region that is located to the South of the peninsula.
 In this place, the mountains of the Peninsula mix with the Meseta and then resurge to form the 360 km long Ellsworth mountain range, which is divided into two by the Minnesota glacier.
 In the northern sector, Cordillera Sentinel, are the highest peaks of Antarctica, the Vinson Massif, with a summit at 4,892 meters.
 In remote areas, where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone could be their only option.
 A satellite phone cannot be equated to a mobile phone, because, to make a call, one must be outdoors and have a clear line of sight to the satellite.
 The service is commonly used in water transportation, including recreational boating, as well as for expeditions that require remote data and voice.
 You may check with your local telephone service provider for more information on how to subscribe to this service.
 Combining travel and learning has become a very popular option among those who plan to take a year off.
 This is very popular among high school graduates,
 In many cases, enrolling in a study abroad program for a year can, in fact, increase the chances of getting into higher education once you return to your home country.
 Normally, there will be a fee for enrolling in these educational programs.
 Finland is an excellent destination for sailing,
 Always a yacht is needed in the archipelagoes and lakes.
 Well, the coastal archipelagos and the larger lakes are large enough for any yacht,
 Sailing is a recreational activity at a national level in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight inhabitants.
 But, again, it's quite unique.
 Most of the exclusive cruises that sail through the Baltic Sea include a long stay in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This means that you have the possibility of making a visit to the historic city for a few days during your return trip, sleeping on the boat at night.
 If you only disembark during excursions,
 In the brochures of some cruise lines, Berlin, Germany, appears. However, as can be seen on the map above, the city is not near the sea and its visit is not included in the price of the cruise.
 To travel by airplane can generate fear in people of any age and place, in particular if they have never gone through the experience or if they have lived some traumatic situation.
 No one should feel ashamed of it.
 For some, understanding a little bit about how airplanes work and what happens during a flight can help to overcome a fear that stems from a lack of knowledge or a sense of not having control.
 The companies that make the deliveries,
 But for some smaller companies,
 If they made a shipment by air, in some routes it may have been delayed days in the unloading and customs.
 The only option to make it faster was to send it as checked baggage.
 The obvious way to travel in the first or executive class of an airplane is to spend a fortune on that privilege.
 But this comes at a price.
 Generally, it's a waste of time to look for first or business class seats on direct flights.
 There are a number of these,
 The capital of Moldavia is Chisinau.
 Moldavia is a Republic composed of many ethnicities, among which have arisen conflicts of that kind.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the self-proclaimed Transnistria,
 Despite the failure of the political negotiations, economic ties between the two parts of Moldova have been reestablished.
 Orthodox Christianity is the majority religion in Moldova.
 Istanbul is the third largest city in Turkey, with approximately 3.7 million inhabitants, the second largest port after Istanbul and a very good transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Ephesus,
 Both the extensive boulevards and the vanguard shopping centers are dotted with traditional red tile roofs, from the market of the eighteenth century and from the old mosques and churches.
 The people of Haldarsvík have excursions to the nearby island of Eysturoy and have an atypical octagonal church.
 In the Camposanto, there are interesting marble sculptures in the form of doves on some tombs.
 It is worth while to spend half an hour in giving a walk through the fascinating town.
 Towards the North and within easy reach is the romantic and alucinating city of Sintra, which gained popularity among foreigners thanks to a vivid account of its splendours by Lord Byron.
 In Scotturb, bus 403 regularly goes to Sintra and stops at Cabo da Roca.
 Also, you should visit, to the North, the great Sanctuary of Nuestra Señora de Fátima, which is a place where there were apparitions of the Virgin Mary, famous all over the world.
 No forget that, basically, you're visiting a place that served as a mass grave and also is a site of a meaning that's practically invaluable to a large part of the world's population.
 There are still many men and women with lives who survived their stay in this place and many more who had loved ones who were murdered or worked there until their death, both Jews and non-Jews.
 Give it all the dignity, the solemnity, and the respect that it deserves.
 No arruine the place by making marks or graffiti on the structures.
 The Catalan and the Spanish are the official languages of Barcelona.
 No obstante, due to the fact that Catalan is, legally, the first language of official character, the majority of the signs are written only in that idiom.
 Still, Spanish is also used a lot in public transportation and other buildings.
 Well, the usual ads in the Metro only appear in Catalan,
 The Parisians have a reputation for being egocentric, rude and arrogant.
 The best way to enjoy Paris,
 A few courteous gestures on her part will quickly dispel the apparent brusque manners of the Parisians.
 The Plitvice National Park is very wooded,
 It has a wide and extraordinary range of vegetable communities, thanks to the variety of microclimates, soils and altitudes.
 This region is also home to a wide variety of animal and bird species.
 The European Brown bear, the Wolf, the Eagle, the Owl, the Lynx, the Wildcat, and the Urogallo, are some of the exotic animals, among many others, that can be found in the place.
 During a visit to monasteries, women must wear skirts that cover the knees and cannot wear their shoulders uncovered.
 If, however, you bring one,
 Following the same line, men are required to wear pants that cover their knees.
 This also can be taken from the available clothing when you enter, but that clothing is not washed after every person wears it, so it may not feel comfortable wearing these skirts.
 The gastronomy of Majorca, like that of other similar regions of the Mediterranean, is based on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and uses olive oil in all its recipes.
 The Pa amb Oli is a popular and simple meal, usual above all in the summer. It is a bread with olive oil, tomato and any other ingredient like cheese or tuna, among others.
 All nouns, as well as the word Sie for you,
 It's a key method for differentiating between certain verbs and objects.
 Though it may also be said that it simplifies the reading,
 To pronounce Italian is relatively simple,
 C and G are the letters with which one must be most attentive,
 As well, make sure you respect the difference in the pronunciation of the r and the rr. For example, caro means costly, while carro means automobile.
 The Persian language has a relatively simple and for the most part regular grammar.
 Therefore, the reading of this grammar will help you to learn much about Persian grammar and to gain a better understanding of Persian sentences.
 It is not necessary to explain that if you know any of the Romance languages,
 No obstante, those who speak some Spanish may come to the hasty conclusion that Portuguese is quite similar and that it is unnecessary to study it individually.
 In the present day,
 Since, in its heyday, light pollution was not a problem of great magnitude as it is today, it is common to find them in cities or on campuses, being of easier access than those that are built in modern times.
 Most of the current research telescopes consist of huge structures installed in remote areas with propitious atmospheric conditions.
 The contemplation of the cherry blossom, called hanami, has been traditional in Japan since the eighth century.
 The concept came from China, where the flower of the Plum tree was the most appreciated.
 It was the Emperor of Japan who organized the first celebrations of the cherry blossom,
 Plants do better when they're in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to just pick up one.
 If you collect specimens during a visit to a formally organized garden,
 Singapore is a very safe place to be and very easy to get around.
 But, due to its location in the high tropics,
 Additionally, some buses head North to Hebron,
 He must verify that the bus he is about to board is going to Hebron and not just to Kiryat Arba, which is a Jewish neighborhood near Hebron.
 Internal navigable canals can be a good topic for vacation.
 For example, visiting the castles of the Loire Valley, the Rhine Valley, taking a cruise to interesting destinations on the Danube, or cruising on the Erie Canal.
 Also delimit the routes for popular hiking and cycling.
 For the Christian religion, Christmas is one of its most important festivities, in which the birth of Jesus Christ is celebrated.
 There are numerous traditions related to this festival that have also been incorporated by non-believers,
 It is a tradition to spend Easter night in a place exposed to contemplate the rising of the sun.
 Well, of course, there are Christian theological explanations of this tradition,
 The most traditional churches usually offer a Paschal Vigil on the Saturday night during the Easter weekend, and, generally, the congregations begin the celebrations for the resurrection of Christ just as the midnight hour arrives.
 All animals that originally came to the Islands,
 Because they are so far away from the mainland,
 Many mammalian species have been introduced to Galápagos since man arrived in the archipelago, such as, for example, the caprine, equine and bovine livestock, or rodents, dogs and cats.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic regions in the winter, you will experience the phenomenon of polar night, which means that the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 Since the sky will remain dark almost all day, it's a great opportunity to contemplate the northern lights.
 Thanks to the sparse population that resides in such regions and, as a result, there are usually no light pollution problems,
 In Japan, the labor culture has a more verticalist and formal structure than what Westerners are possibly accustomed to.
 The typical clothing of the business world is suits and the workmates are called by their first names or by their job titles.
 Harmony in the workplace is fundamental, where the efforts of the group are emphasized before focusing on the praise of individual achievements.
 Frequently, workers must get the approval of their superiors for decision making and are expected to obey their instructions without question.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.1968983384958523, 'precisions': [0.5713787433354925, 0.30487484913680013, 0.18647824882238848, 0.11694258541740049], 'brevity_penalty': 0.7931044991817598, 'length_ratio': 0.8118199101978075, 'translation_length': 20069, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 44.74280778880988, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2} results comet:{'mean_score': 0.7468609564860348, 'scores': [0.4304589331150055, 0.5010095834732056, 0.9192503690719604, 0.41151008009910583, 0.38031795620918274, 0.6554656028747559, 0.8390349745750427, 0.8570029139518738, 0.8527253270149231, 0.8473713994026184, 0.8587000966072083, 0.8286954164505005, 0.3996751010417938, 0.9030033946037292, 0.857326090335846, 0.8020510077476501, 0.9020416140556335, 0.8717621564865112, 0.5925272703170776, 0.3368103802204132, 0.9298853278160095, 0.9415066838264465, 0.8250864744186401, 0.7195335030555725, 0.4488084018230438, 0.90463787317276, 0.8483114242553711, 0.6859487295150757, 0.8428600430488586, 0.863426148891449, 0.8221566081047058, 0.8398531675338745, 0.5050711035728455, 0.8882785439491272, 0.8684017658233643, 0.4262423813343048, 0.8815297484397888, 0.8701900839805603, 0.7101394534111023, 0.8845614194869995, 0.8419284820556641, 0.9457119107246399, 0.8170754313468933, 0.9083349108695984, 0.5582315325737, 0.539145290851593, 0.8856849670410156, 0.8931746482849121, 0.8121587038040161, 0.34066274762153625, 0.7427147626876831, 0.9121785759925842, 0.907126784324646, 0.9195831418037415, 0.30898556113243103, 0.7697921395301819, 0.8092882037162781, 0.8276683688163757, 0.4853532612323761, 0.9268037676811218, 0.40459397435188293, 0.8956708312034607, 0.4962732493877411, 0.9095638394355774, 0.8864086270332336, 0.7605077028274536, 0.8023936748504639, 0.8184928297996521, 0.8888190388679504, 0.5134773850440979, 0.8849989771842957, 0.8275999426841736, 0.7933704257011414, 0.8635193705558777, 0.8849995732307434, 0.8354300260543823, 0.8549500107765198, 0.6895369291305542, 0.5516645908355713, 0.896555483341217, 0.6914352774620056, 0.6885653138160706, 0.5571133494377136, 0.8273217082023621, 0.7884976267814636, 0.8243667483329773, 0.833435595035553, 0.8769048452377319, 0.8675050139427185, 0.8182734251022339, 0.8321111798286438, 0.8561899662017822, 0.8652493953704834, 0.8914325833320618, 0.8785228133201599, 0.5893895030021667, 0.4472692608833313, 0.46103209257125854, 0.8593003153800964, 0.8644551634788513, 0.8678571581840515, 0.6668593287467957, 0.9048212170600891, 0.9029752016067505, 0.6734074950218201, 0.5780816674232483, 0.8518891930580139, 0.8324130177497864, 0.35034775733947754, 0.43987539410591125, 0.6800287365913391, 0.9108622074127197, 0.9261248707771301, 0.9275291562080383, 0.8761003613471985, 0.8451444506645203, 0.8486998677253723, 0.8982382416725159, 0.5411256551742554, 0.862855851650238, 0.7735692858695984, 0.5969974398612976, 0.8789613842964172, 0.6134327054023743, 0.89676833152771, 0.4239443242549896, 0.8384137749671936, 0.9121188521385193, 0.8011434674263, 0.6953920722007751, 0.7341892123222351, 0.8554329872131348, 0.45192694664001465, 0.8730344176292419, 0.8994750380516052, 0.5642231106758118, 0.9037304520606995, 0.9055225849151611, 0.9341221451759338, 0.812391459941864, 0.6425148844718933, 0.621562659740448, 0.6095985174179077, 0.5620716214179993, 0.9008191823959351, 0.8563548922538757, 0.6132122874259949, 0.8965502977371216, 0.8533583879470825, 0.8830792903900146, 0.4981488287448883, 0.6718911528587341, 0.836818516254425, 0.826701819896698, 0.5521865487098694, 0.8696642518043518, 0.8702235221862793, 0.7211390137672424, 0.8482570648193359, 0.43685999512672424, 0.7725252509117126, 0.42880693078041077, 0.5610182285308838, 0.6247348189353943, 0.8920518159866333, 0.7347004413604736, 0.8792737126350403, 0.871354877948761, 0.816327691078186, 0.5489816665649414, 0.8412368893623352, 0.8414152264595032, 0.8963751196861267, 0.6579508185386658, 0.7093437314033508, 0.8988876938819885, 0.5307319164276123, 0.9164082407951355, 0.8530023694038391, 0.9354270696640015, 0.877702534198761, 0.9445459842681885, 0.4933536648750305, 0.8626316785812378, 0.8172062635421753, 0.9021523594856262, 0.7165657877922058, 0.4579244554042816, 0.43078264594078064, 0.5205296874046326, 0.8794306516647339, 0.8699950575828552, 0.8564380407333374, 0.34597140550613403, 0.6478527188301086, 0.7236268520355225, 0.4054892957210541, 0.7946177124977112, 0.8542290925979614, 0.8702166676521301, 0.7941969633102417, 0.784474790096283, 0.8193061947822571, 0.707718014717102, 0.8783593773841858, 0.8200126886367798, 0.8613767027854919, 0.8342196941375732, 0.48714277148246765, 0.9288055896759033, 0.5457807183265686, 0.8709569573402405, 0.8291301131248474, 0.5497950911521912, 0.9202711582183838, 0.5491732358932495, 0.8465000987052917, 0.5214037299156189, 0.8850658535957336, 0.8527255654335022, 0.8432536721229553, 0.878660261631012, 0.9216445684432983, 0.8988685011863708, 0.9319295287132263, 0.860609233379364, 0.6295837163925171, 0.5777644515037537, 0.7109364867210388, 0.8774183988571167, 0.9318929314613342, 0.8822499513626099, 0.716713011264801, 0.8762204051017761, 0.8220815658569336, 0.8870751857757568, 0.8734228014945984, 0.4636540114879608, 0.9160628318786621, 0.7652768492698669, 0.7422123551368713, 0.8496938347816467, 0.542267382144928, 0.5585299134254456, 0.8631601333618164, 0.3830118179321289, 0.7950494885444641, 0.5076165795326233, 0.4750102460384369, 0.9170375466346741, 0.8933847546577454, 0.8017780780792236, 0.9110122919082642, 0.8743610978126526, 0.900606095790863, 0.6968116760253906, 0.9029911160469055, 0.9041193127632141, 0.7570157647132874, 0.5861751437187195, 0.3937104642391205, 0.3735368847846985, 0.38334035873413086, 0.85176020860672, 0.8446820378303528, 0.7528414130210876, 0.5055283308029175, 0.898104727268219, 0.8923689126968384, 0.4218513071537018, 0.8877755999565125, 0.7901444435119629, 0.8815603256225586, 0.8286452889442444, 0.644938051700592, 0.3681846857070923, 0.5617608428001404, 0.900084376335144, 0.6177479028701782, 0.7192209362983704, 0.8935032486915588, 0.7568529844284058, 0.8595042824745178, 0.8729966282844543, 0.8912349343299866, 0.9277656674385071, 0.8716537952423096, 0.5545551776885986, 0.8874050974845886, 0.4272875487804413, 0.5603143572807312, 0.8473968505859375, 0.8719976544380188, 0.8930588364601135, 0.7169710397720337, 0.7583402395248413, 0.40325987339019775, 0.8880581855773926, 0.6468457579612732, 0.701641321182251, 0.8775184750556946, 0.589892566204071, 0.867779016494751, 0.5204386115074158, 0.8746629953384399, 0.39584845304489136, 0.7587052583694458, 0.6365002393722534, 0.886832058429718, 0.8648788928985596, 0.889890730381012, 0.9341252446174622, 0.4276891052722931, 0.7345942854881287, 0.8866153359413147, 0.8113884329795837, 0.8602188229560852, 0.8732326626777649, 0.8878958821296692, 0.5888305306434631, 0.41587698459625244, 0.4313146770000458, 0.30894866585731506, 0.4196222126483917, 0.8624767065048218, 0.4170075058937073, 0.8533173203468323, 0.7804951071739197, 0.9065641760826111, 0.8142766952514648, 0.8324229121208191, 0.8245634436607361, 0.8621169924736023, 0.8417494297027588, 0.9291669726371765, 0.848002016544342, 0.8804681897163391, 0.8082773089408875, 0.5741233825683594, 0.8883363008499146, 0.8361900448799133, 0.7090278267860413, 0.6436460614204407, 0.6049262881278992, 0.857936441898346, 0.8362690806388855, 0.5683620572090149, 0.7621588110923767, 0.6328888535499573, 0.7698090672492981, 0.8793059587478638, 0.8274727463722229, 0.7344285845756531, 0.7406973838806152, 0.7368449568748474, 0.8875405788421631, 0.8829308152198792, 0.5989071130752563, 0.8259901404380798, 0.8037638664245605, 0.4461107552051544, 0.8869190216064453, 0.7170509696006775, 0.6733465790748596, 0.5858680009841919, 0.7106634974479675, 0.4947880804538727, 0.7311542630195618, 0.7963617444038391, 0.6309149861335754, 0.689226508140564, 0.4599049389362335, 0.6071410775184631, 0.8739599585533142, 0.8993970155715942, 0.3478088676929474, 0.9173173308372498, 0.9173533916473389, 0.8480132818222046, 0.8355476260185242, 0.49427852034568787, 0.7296200394630432, 0.4995952546596527, 0.35754966735839844, 0.442656546831131, 0.8547981977462769, 0.7334522604942322, 0.8576222658157349, 0.4211728870868683, 0.8882225751876831, 0.6909769177436829, 0.9122083783149719, 0.9100286364555359, 0.9046536684036255, 0.8739509582519531, 0.737697184085846, 0.41035333275794983, 0.7775129079818726, 0.7994235157966614, 0.44909679889678955, 0.3569563329219818, 0.5926257371902466, 0.45075637102127075, 0.6511090993881226, 0.5021582841873169, 0.8982844948768616, 0.4206605851650238, 0.569316565990448, 0.8405799269676208, 0.9153863787651062, 0.8373038172721863, 0.8195789456367493, 0.8489555716514587, 0.9071853756904602, 0.8574921488761902, 0.5909085869789124, 0.8807355761528015, 0.8152595162391663, 0.8862887620925903, 0.8694647550582886, 0.8878288865089417, 0.7001325488090515, 0.8824469447135925, 0.834253191947937, 0.8206856846809387, 0.9127529263496399, 0.8798573613166809, 0.8418962359428406, 0.8445851802825928, 0.3053452968597412, 0.8911212086677551, 0.4444490373134613, 0.8689993023872375, 0.830198347568512, 0.5008273720741272, 0.8043096661567688, 0.8257045149803162, 0.9135979413986206, 0.729280412197113, 0.8778141736984253, 0.8941795229911804, 0.8053103089332581, 0.9446350932121277, 0.858059823513031, 0.8330261707305908, 0.4235301613807678, 0.3950570225715637, 0.7375407814979553, 0.8952496647834778, 0.7407299280166626, 0.5808435678482056, 0.8670815825462341, 0.898246169090271, 0.8703118562698364, 0.855857253074646, 0.8462724089622498, 0.4941713511943817, 0.8853569030761719, 0.812863290309906, 0.5352204442024231, 0.5704177021980286, 0.3585549592971802, 0.6807648539543152, 0.7860093712806702, 0.8522874712944031, 0.584840714931488, 0.27668580412864685, 0.7664193511009216, 0.4066685140132904, 0.7303714752197266, 0.8153349757194519, 0.5113168358802795, 0.4885818064212799, 0.8094754815101624, 0.772812008857727, 0.7946451306343079, 0.8251478672027588, 0.8848523497581482, 0.6548225283622742, 0.8994140625, 0.7844278216362, 0.820514976978302, 0.8988855481147766, 0.42186054587364197, 0.8327223062515259, 0.881646454334259, 0.8634282350540161, 0.8140168786048889, 0.5389083623886108, 0.8842859864234924, 0.47126856446266174, 0.8230637907981873, 0.910240650177002, 0.8920748233795166, 0.8118657469749451, 0.8693702220916748, 0.4952041208744049, 0.8923121690750122, 0.895920991897583, 0.8654839396476746, 0.5783887505531311, 0.9301546812057495, 0.42985641956329346, 0.8610711693763733, 0.42708057165145874, 0.8965706825256348, 0.8272408246994019, 0.847282350063324, 0.8378257155418396, 0.3877139985561371, 0.460549920797348, 0.7705787420272827, 0.44334402680397034, 0.8340979218482971, 0.8860928416252136, 0.9277216196060181, 0.8232603669166565, 0.7530718445777893, 0.865933895111084, 0.8467068076133728, 0.847449779510498, 0.4902511537075043, 0.857059121131897, 0.8575131297111511, 0.8757043480873108, 0.866820752620697, 0.7077578902244568, 0.7664472460746765, 0.8451835513114929, 0.37089037895202637, 0.8554026484489441, 0.42363783717155457, 0.822282075881958, 0.8395499587059021, 0.7634541392326355, 0.5197879672050476, 0.835560142993927, 0.8582929372787476, 0.7050212025642395, 0.628679096698761, 0.6544539332389832, 0.6449974179267883, 0.8726664185523987, 0.45713239908218384, 0.7937158346176147, 0.5499551892280579, 0.8651566505432129, 0.6604932546615601, 0.8439446687698364, 0.8924046754837036, 0.7991467118263245, 0.7794342637062073, 0.6376094222068787, 0.8678318858146667, 0.6413714289665222, 0.6148868203163147, 0.8422384262084961, 0.8487175107002258, 0.7783375382423401, 0.77665114402771, 0.9014310836791992, 0.8885143399238586, 0.5539737343788147, 0.6260153651237488, 0.3438167870044708, 0.7146652340888977, 0.39098918437957764, 0.5705183148384094, 0.4672786593437195, 0.6628434062004089, 0.8792935609817505, 0.8553693890571594, 0.773198127746582, 0.7717285752296448, 0.6648740172386169, 0.861060380935669, 0.8683832883834839, 0.8213719725608826, 0.6505157947540283, 0.6141942143440247, 0.856130063533783, 0.9232137799263, 0.8382296562194824, 0.59454745054245, 0.4609616696834564, 0.8683570027351379, 0.4958711564540863, 0.8271531462669373, 0.8241361379623413, 0.9195064902305603, 0.9003656506538391, 0.8660286068916321, 0.8119597434997559, 0.7614390254020691, 0.8575668931007385, 0.6318482756614685, 0.870414674282074, 0.894509494304657, 0.8492623567581177, 0.878767192363739, 0.8349781632423401, 0.4418172538280487, 0.6053584218025208, 0.892559826374054, 0.8540310859680176, 0.919891893863678, 0.821556568145752, 0.8292194604873657, 0.7783172726631165, 0.8561449646949768, 0.9030658602714539, 0.9049999117851257, 0.666032612323761, 0.8820875287055969, 0.5954054594039917, 0.41886958479881287, 0.8999412655830383, 0.6901469230651855, 0.5909512639045715, 0.8625167012214661, 0.9406647086143494, 0.6678783297538757, 0.8867903351783752, 0.5448334813117981, 0.7853633761405945, 0.8188672661781311, 0.880998969078064, 0.7690085172653198, 0.7013192772865295, 0.6432294845581055, 0.3924192488193512, 0.9029905796051025, 0.823238730430603, 0.8705874085426331, 0.9183619022369385, 0.9097694158554077, 0.9134355187416077, 0.6616300344467163, 0.7965842485427856, 0.29033932089805603, 0.8349354267120361, 0.7674729228019714, 0.855901837348938, 0.8190130591392517, 0.8505240678787231, 0.6860395669937134, 0.8641464114189148, 0.8844084143638611, 0.6682386994361877, 0.6716522574424744, 0.9227731823921204, 0.7748686671257019, 0.8258005380630493, 0.8234205842018127, 0.8286083340644836, 0.9170306921005249, 0.896769106388092, 0.7730515003204346, 0.741809606552124, 0.31676197052001953, 0.4139105975627899, 0.3436388671398163, 0.8031966090202332, 0.8002400398254395, 0.9123744964599609, 0.8181589245796204, 0.5705468058586121, 0.8935248255729675, 0.7372637987136841, 0.8812732100486755, 0.7008724808692932, 0.9291579127311707, 0.8564079999923706, 0.8743004202842712, 0.8895589709281921, 0.885080873966217, 0.8673682808876038, 0.8939054608345032, 0.3801529109477997, 0.8774917125701904, 0.8411749005317688, 0.7675196528434753, 0.8813024759292603, 0.857999324798584, 0.41686537861824036, 0.9231773018836975, 0.879272997379303, 0.879368245601654, 0.6754328012466431, 0.3958018124103546, 0.9047970175743103, 0.8507735729217529, 0.8781651854515076, 0.5981128811836243, 0.8055373430252075, 0.7196203470230103, 0.5615928173065186, 0.8563279509544373, 0.8798590302467346, 0.9103450179100037, 0.6819532513618469, 0.6375591158866882, 0.8681813478469849, 0.8285097479820251, 0.6186002492904663, 0.8930118680000305, 0.495429664850235, 0.8696520924568176, 0.8948401212692261, 0.8560629487037659, 0.9017718434333801, 0.8106059432029724, 0.9055378437042236, 0.882104218006134, 0.49522665143013, 0.3273211419582367, 0.519826352596283, 0.46215057373046875, 0.5269262790679932, 0.8301215171813965, 0.6720254421234131, 0.6935276985168457, 0.8974125981330872, 0.9111188054084778, 0.8735184669494629, 0.9219986796379089, 0.8887699246406555, 0.6231962442398071, 0.7441128492355347, 0.8869895935058594, 0.7536646723747253, 0.6939001083374023, 0.6156509518623352, 0.6340555548667908, 0.7932694554328918, 0.8948293328285217, 0.8890582919120789, 0.8492727279663086, 0.900128185749054, 0.799813449382782, 0.7578191161155701, 0.7807963490486145, 0.8734866976737976, 0.8236064314842224, 0.8721493482589722, 0.8773573637008667, 0.3273766338825226, 0.5221605896949768, 0.8589417338371277, 0.8901435732841492, 0.9237778186798096, 0.9252756834030151, 0.7532979846000671, 0.5163609385490417, 0.5050071477890015, 0.8297024369239807, 0.5607662796974182, 0.7831719517707825, 0.831203281879425, 0.668668806552887, 0.9270493388175964, 0.672844409942627, 0.5658785700798035, 0.6907068490982056, 0.39870786666870117, 0.7965908646583557, 0.6994637846946716, 0.8602179884910583, 0.9103559851646423, 0.8721439838409424, 0.8778952956199646, 0.527588963508606, 0.8648805022239685, 0.6325361728668213, 0.8748250007629395, 0.8727203607559204, 0.5659657120704651, 0.7079204320907593, 0.6208980083465576, 0.5967505574226379, 0.891504168510437, 0.6116361021995544, 0.8252971768379211, 0.6591079831123352, 0.36060476303100586, 0.6403367519378662, 0.8141763210296631, 0.7205926775932312, 0.8402704000473022, 0.27307650446891785, 0.9140938520431519, 0.8537013530731201, 0.8952208161354065, 0.4643503725528717, 0.5451707243919373, 0.3379998505115509, 0.7622259855270386, 0.5150567889213562, 0.49224475026130676, 0.7268158793449402, 0.8434343934059143, 0.600468635559082, 0.9141951203346252, 0.5566719174385071, 0.5183035731315613, 0.7246795296669006, 0.8978013396263123, 0.8779299259185791, 0.8997756838798523, 0.5230206847190857, 0.8600124716758728, 0.5920507311820984, 0.38125303387641907, 0.8026705980300903, 0.8417304158210754, 0.4069559574127197, 0.8029161095619202, 0.75595623254776, 0.4118405878543854, 0.8466386795043945, 0.7576015591621399, 0.7209177017211914, 0.8619341254234314, 0.7389100193977356, 0.9049361944198608, 0.876991868019104, 0.8010593056678772, 0.8850812911987305, 0.8566843867301941, 0.5230154395103455, 0.7116341590881348, 0.4365043640136719, 0.8608260750770569, 0.7230193614959717, 0.8640572428703308, 0.8678473830223083, 0.8881987929344177, 0.3763841986656189, 0.7149297595024109, 0.9042899012565613, 0.8133464455604553, 0.8302335739135742, 0.8343381285667419, 0.6032691597938538, 0.5136013031005859, 0.8269185423851013, 0.7792144417762756, 0.8827611207962036, 0.7731828093528748, 0.8282858729362488, 0.844763994216919, 0.5970961451530457, 0.8899375796318054, 0.8695421814918518, 0.3191062808036804, 0.7844840288162231, 0.2689310312271118, 0.9178143739700317, 0.8442678451538086, 0.4097539782524109, 0.8922662138938904, 0.7648032903671265, 0.904035747051239, 0.8040972352027893, 0.7816532850265503, 0.3594827651977539, 0.5534819960594177, 0.31780460476875305, 0.8799722790718079, 0.8161002397537231, 0.8892991542816162, 0.865914523601532, 0.9169865250587463, 0.8839541077613831, 0.8904311656951904, 0.8447022438049316, 0.784963071346283, 0.8625965714454651, 0.9569119811058044, 0.5098431706428528, 0.8699220418930054, 0.9093368649482727, 0.9174855947494507, 0.8690987229347229, 0.7133030295372009, 0.8576026558876038, 0.8489411473274231, 0.8449807167053223, 0.8282454013824463, 0.4503755569458008, 0.8748758435249329, 0.5770953893661499, 0.6846835017204285, 0.538551390171051, 0.8896387815475464, 0.5325111150741577, 0.5426951050758362, 0.831811249256134, 0.9146347641944885, 0.9007361531257629, 0.6633747220039368, 0.8576769232749939, 0.8237932324409485, 0.8911508321762085, 0.8974558711051941, 0.8697347044944763, 0.7804569005966187, 0.8441470265388489, 0.7972817420959473, 0.9223684072494507, 0.8736682534217834, 0.8377725481987, 0.8933184146881104, 0.8877377510070801, 0.5030023455619812, 0.8951982855796814, 0.9200298190116882, 0.5264165997505188, 0.7619123458862305, 0.7325098514556885, 0.8667080402374268, 0.47699129581451416, 0.8786703944206238, 0.8227009773254395, 0.5368452072143555, 0.8720986247062683, 0.8078398704528809, 0.5482354164123535, 0.8940216302871704, 0.4086563289165497, 0.4685201942920685, 0.7920878529548645, 0.7082438468933105, 0.7773703932762146, 0.4597032070159912, 0.8083857893943787, 0.36640745401382446, 0.6722645163536072, 0.8080546259880066, 0.7521193027496338, 0.9182774424552917, 0.9482494592666626, 0.915278971195221, 0.45137667655944824, 0.6974857449531555, 0.7638320326805115, 0.855782687664032, 0.7862558364868164, 0.8578463196754456, 0.9052768349647522, 0.7768195271492004, 0.7624894976615906, 0.8027237057685852, 0.7343998551368713, 0.8056802153587341, 0.7355348467826843, 0.8264326453208923, 0.8449175357818604, 0.47688028216362, 0.9592480063438416, 0.37247225642204285, 0.7850906252861023, 0.5781922936439514, 0.8860570788383484, 0.9532248973846436, 0.7854604721069336, 0.8659655451774597, 0.3243994116783142, 0.907653272151947, 0.7350685000419617, 0.8910373449325562, 0.8278382420539856, 0.5217756628990173, 0.9086609482765198, 0.5038973093032837, 0.6391344666481018, 0.6428173184394836, 0.7946242690086365, 0.9253525137901306, 0.8465197682380676, 0.605803906917572, 0.8289373517036438, 0.39949801564216614, 0.832601010799408, 0.8985801339149475, 0.8648854494094849, 0.845851719379425, 0.6637687683105469, 0.7681209444999695, 0.6201980113983154, 0.8506476283073425, 0.5951860547065735, 0.41347888112068176, 0.8266820311546326, 0.7525271773338318, 0.8830035328865051, 0.8741623163223267, 0.9001505970954895, 0.8026017546653748, 0.8288761973381042, 0.7046859860420227, 0.836313784122467, 0.6042311787605286, 0.38566288352012634, 0.7980461716651917, 0.8950919508934021, 0.7886653542518616, 0.7696438431739807, 0.8956764340400696, 0.8777186274528503, 0.879020094871521, 0.8784910440444946]}